The goods cost less than 20 euros.
The fee is 40% of the value of the goods....
I am a #PRS_ORG# large customer and therefore it is no problem for me.
I just need a number or instruction on how to address the package so that it can be returned to you.
I ordered the #PRS_ORG# a few days ago... for 249€.
Today, it costs 179€.
I find that rather annoying.
Do I have to cancel the order and re-order for the better price, or is there another way to get a refund?
I generally agree that children should not be expected to take on a parental role for their younger siblings.
However, I think it's good for big brothers and sisters to take care of the little ones in moderation.
Just a quick look, just a quick help, just bring the bottle, etc.
So they learn responsibility, help in the family and are integrated.
As long as they can still have their own children, I don't see a problem.
If your K1 is alone for a short time and it's OK for him, that's good.
You can judge for yourself whether this is suitable for your children.
It's not like he's going to climb K2 and accompany you while you sleep for hours.
It is probably legally questionable.
Perhaps this explains the psychologist's statement.
Because if something were to happen, like a fire, burglary, earthquake, alien invasion, etc., it would actually be too much responsibility for K1 to take care of K2.
Whether that is a risk you want to take is, of course, your prerogative ;)
Please help me find the title of a book!
I remember reading a crime/thriller a few years ago and I can still remember almost the entire plot, but the title will not come to me. Maybe someone here knows something...
The story was about fear and how to overcome it.
At the beginning of the story, a zookeeper commits suicide by overfeeding himself and going into his predator enclosure.
The case is taken over by a detective who, after a short investigation, gets in touch with the therapist who runs a clinic where he treats patients with anxiety.
The commissioner has a small niece who also has a fear (of fire) and lands at this therapist.
There are more suicides and there is another protagonist - a photographer who is anonymously commissioned to go to the scene of each suicide and document it and post the photos on the internet.
At the end of the day, it turns out that this therapist runs an underground therapy group where patients are implanted with a chip that suppresses an anxiety center in the brain and the patients ultimately face their fears in the most extreme way possible.
(One woman jumps out of a window, another drives herself to death on purpose)
This is what the book refers to as "the fight."
In the end, there is a big showdown in the clinic that had been on fire.
That's the gist of the plot, I'm pretty sure the book was written by a French author/author.
If this action is known to someone or even if someone reveals the title of the book to me, I would be very happy.
Oh, I don't have the password for the WLAN available.
I have to contact my husband first.
But it can take a while.
What steps should I take afterwards?
Is it also possible to get the price difference refunded?
Child, 4 years old, splinter under the nail
The four-year-old has splinters of wood under his thumb nail (outside) over the entire length of the nail.
They tried to pull him out with a pin.
Very difficult to grasp.
It didn't work and hurt.
Now the child reacts hysterically when we try to approach it.
No chance anymore.
Tomorrow, I go to the doctor.
All Bosch electric, pneumatic and measuring tools are carefully tested, inspected and subject to the strict quality control of Bosch quality assurance.
Therefore, Bosch offers a guarantee for Bosch electric tools, pneumatic tools and measuring tools.
The buyer's claims under the purchase contract with the seller, as well as statutory rights, are not restricted by this guarantee.
For these tools, we provide a guarantee in accordance with the following conditions:
We guarantee according to the following regulations (Nos. 2 - 7) by free repair of defects in the tool that are attributable to a material or manufacturing defect within the warranty period.
The warranty period is 24 months, 12 months for commercial or professional use or equivalent wear and tear.
The warranty period begins with the first end-user.
The date on the original purchase receipt is the relevant date.
For all blue professional electric and measuring tools (excluding high-frequency tools, industrial battery-powered screwdrivers, and pneumatic tools) purchased on or after 01.09.2004, the warranty period is extended to 36 months if the buyer registers the tools within 4 weeks of the purchase date.
Battery packs and chargers, as well as any supplied accessories, are excluded from this warranty extension.
The registration can only be done online at www.bosch-pt.com/warranty.
As proof, the registration receipt must be printed out immediately, and the original purchase receipt, from which the date of purchase can be derived.
Only a registration is possible if the buyer agrees to the storage of his data there.
Excluded from the guarantee are parts that are subject to wear and tear due to normal use or other natural causes, as well as defects in the tool that are due to normal use or other natural causes, anomalous environmental conditions, non-standard operating conditions, overloading, or insufficient maintenance or care.
Defects in the tool caused by the use of non-Bosch original parts.
Tools that have been changed or added to.
Minor deviations from the desired shape, which are insignificant for the value and usability of the tool.
The remedy for the defect we recognize as warranty-compliant is carried out in such a way that we repair the defective tool at our discretion for free or replace it with a flawless tool (if necessary, also with a successor model).
Any tools or parts replaced go into our property.
When did the deadline expire?
According to the Distance Selling Act, I have a right of withdrawal for one month.
The LokSound 5 is the most important member of the LokSound family.
By combining the digital decoder and sound module on a printed circuit board, we achieve dimensions of only 30mm x 15.5mm, which means that it can be installed in almost any locomotive of the H0 and 0 track widths.
LokSound 5 decoders are offered with all common interfaces and always come with a 11x15mm "sugar cube" speaker with a sound capsule kit.
Like all family members, the LokSound5 is a true multi-protocol decoder.
He masters the DCC data format just as well as Motorola®, Selectrix® and M4.
In the DCC format, 14 to 128 steps are as natural as 2- and 4-digit addresses and up to 32 functions.
Thanks to RailComPlus®, the decoders automatically connect to a suitable digital central.
It masters all DCC programming modes and thanks to RailCom® it is possible to read the CV values on the main track from compatible central units.
For central units that can only program CVs from 1-255, there may exist helper registers.
Motorola users benefit from up to 28 steps at 255 addresses.
Three additional Motorola® addresses allow the triggering of 16 functions.
A built-in programming mode also makes it possible to reprogram the venerable Control Unit 6021.
The M4 protocol allows for automatic registration at mfx®-compatible central offices.
The LokSound 5 decoder recognizes Märklin® brake tracks just as well as ZIMO® HLU brake commands or the Lenz® ABC system.
Braking with DCC brake blocks or with DC voltage is also possible.
In addition, he also has a Selectrix® brake diode.
An ABC pendulum train automation system allows automatic switching between two stations.
The LokSound 5 decoder can be used on both analog DC and AC tracks.
After my voucher was not extended due to a complaint that I did not receive, I will order my order worth approx.
#NUMBER#€ from my shopping cart removed and ordered elsewhere where the customer service is better and I don't have to waste my time trying to reach nobody!!
What am I supposed to do with this number?
Because of Omikron: Johnson wants to promote booster vaccinations
Politics and science in Britain are dealing with new Omikron cases.
By New Year's Eve, all eligible adults in England should have received an offer to be vaccinated.
London - British Prime Minister Boris Johnson wants to speed up the booster vaccinations against Corona in view of the rapidly increasing Omikron figures even faster than previously planned.
Every adult in England should have the opportunity to get a booster dose by the end of the year, if at least three months have passed since the second vaccination, Johnson said in a prerecorded video message to his countrymen on Sunday evening.
Previously, the target date was set for the end of January.
The British government will also provide additional support to accelerate the vaccination campaigns in Scotland, Wales and Northern Ireland.
People are facing an emergency in the face of the Omikron variant, which is why the vaccination protection must be strengthened urgently, said Johnson.
The good news is that the protection level can be increased again with a third vaccination dose.
"Let's boo now," Johnson said.
On Sunday, 1239 more cases of the Omicron variant were recorded in the UK, taking the total to 3137.
Compared to the previous day, it was an increase of 65 percent. dpa
Will the full amount be refunded from the purchase price upon collection?
I'm for everyone using pronouns
I sent in an application.
Today, an invitation to a conversation was sent by email.
I want to reply to the email.
Unfortunately, the name is not "Peter," but a somewhat more complicated name.
I've googled him/her and depending on where he/she comes from, it's either a man or a woman.
**I have no idea how to write an email now.
Can someone please help me?
** I'm a foreigner and I don't want to step on any bureaucrat's toes.
Conclusion: Everyone should imagine using pronouns.
I have a total of 5 books on it.
Four of them go.
Only one thing I bought today doesn't work
Apparently, the chair had a hidden defect when it was sold.
How can such a cushion damage occur after 9 months otherwise?
First on the #PRS_ORG#.
But it has been working for some time now.
No more than 14 days.
Therefore, I have always bought the last books on the website and then read them on the #PRS_ORG#.
I bought 6 #PRS_ORG# but wanted to buy 8.
However, there were none left.
Now they are available again and I would like you to add two chairs to the order and bill me for it.
[CW] The feeling when I can't help.
Content warning: I will be discussing domestic violence in detail here.
I just need to write something from my soul.
I (21) come into contact with victims (and perpetrators) of domestic violence more often for professional reasons.
A theme that really bothers me and unfortunately occurs too often is that many victims do not seek help or think we cannot help them.
I am aware that we cannot do everything and it is not perfect.
But there are things in my profession that move me more than when I can't do anything in such situations.
I see the blue spots, the blood, the desperate eyes...
But even in a conversation with the perpetrator far beyond sight and hearing, I cannot reach all of them.
I don't know what the reason is, maybe it's fear, fear of revenge, fear of leaving the familiar social environment, fear of taking the children out of it.
What I always want to make clear to everyone, sometimes even very close to tears, is that all of us are worth living without violence.
I want all women to know that they do not have to accept violence.
I often wish I could help in every case... I know I can't.
But it will never be easy.
Please, always remember that you are worth living without violence, that is so unbelievably important.
"Arcane" on Netflix: What does the series have to do with "League of Legends"?
Lots of fantasy, many complicated names, a jaw-dropping design: "Arcane," the series from the "League of Legends" computer game universe, has recently started on Netflix.
Why are we looking forward to the already announced two seasons?
Basketball Bundesliga: Derby disaster for MHP Riesen Ludwigsburg against Merlins Crailsheim
At least on young Johannes Patrick, there was no help.
Nothing again: For the second time in less than three months, the giants lost in Crailsheim - and how!
Before the game, Ludwigsburg coach John Patrick said of the cup defeat in early October against the Hakro Merlins Crailsheim: "We still have some anger in our stomachs."
But after the game, she didn't lay down - but rather stepped up again, given the 61:72 (28:38) defeat in the Basketball Bundesliga.
More than the naked result, the way of performance disappointed.
As a representative statistic, a statistic is named that expresses the entire dilemma: The three-point quote was just 13 percent, 4 goals (all of which were scored by young Johannes Patrick) in 31 attempts - any further questions?
The answer came from John Patrick: "We were not focused enough after the victory in Tenerife, and we did not implement what we had trained for."
That is, to move the ball.
His opponent Sebastian Gleim reacted differently: "A great game to win against Ludwigsburg for the second time," said the happy coach.
"It felt like being in front of 10,000 people."
On Saturday, only 750 spectators were allowed into the Hohenlohe Arena, but they paid for it.
Not least because of BBL top scorer T.J. Shorts, who marked 22 points and steered his team's game.
"The best player I've ever trained," Gleim praised.
While Patrick's team saw its top performers like Jordan Hulls (0 points) and Jonah Radebaugh (7) fail across the board.
Only in the last quarter (22:15) did the giants prevent a total disaster and came within eight points after having already trailed 39:59.
In addition to Johannes Patrick, Justin Simon scored twelve points.
Unfortunately, there is still plenty of time to haggle.
Already on Wednesday (7:00 p.m.) the giants receive the Skyliners Frankfurt, before then also in Ludwigsburg a maximum of 750 spectators.
We used to have a different email address, but I changed it.
Yes, I have already registered a few months ago.
Unfortunately, all warranty claims were rejected.
We have checked our legal position again and have therefore written to them again.
We had already reported ourselves half a year ago.
Always like an egg: Max Raabe turns 59
He can enthuse his audience with new interpretations of songs from the 1920s and 1930s.
Currently, he is on tour with the program "Good day, dear luck" - if he is allowed to perform.
Actually, Max Raabe was supposed to celebrate his birthday on stage in Leipzig on Sunday.
But nothing comes of it.
The planned concert has been moved to May 2022 - "in accordance with official instructions" to curb the spread of the coronavirus.
Other planned appearances by the singer, who turns 59 today, and his musicians (www.palast-orchester.de) must also fall, as it says on the singer's website and his musicians' website (www.palast-orchester.de).
From January, the artists will then make up for the already postponed dates from 2020 due to the pandemic.
Born on December 12, 1962 in Lünen, North Rhine-Westphalia, Max Raabe has sung a lot and enjoyed it as a youth.
In Berlin, he studied opera singing, in 1986 he founded the Palast Orchester together with fellow students.
Since then, the baritone has established himself with his repertoire of schlager and chanson songs in the style of the Comedian Harmonists.
He has been awarded many prizes.
His live album from the "MTV Unplugged" series (2019) reached - just like his successful album "Für Frauen ist das kein Problem" (2013) - the second place in the charts.
He has managed to take it from the niche into the mainstream.
Always elegantly dressed, the blonde hair strictly combed back and paying attention to etiquette, Max Raabe is not to be missed from the current German-speaking music scene.
With the programme "Guten Tag, liebe Glück", he has been on tour since 2020. dpa
Hello #NAME#, is it also possible to get a small sample of the furniture wood in advance?
It can be supplemented with existing furniture and so we can check beforehand whether it fits in terms of colour
It still doesn't work, I can only fold the cover but I can't turn the pages.
Federal Minister of Construction Klara Geywitz: No new apartments are created through expropriation
The new Federal Minister of Construction, Klara Geywitz (SPD), has spoken out against the expropriation of large apartment complexes, as was demanded in a popular vote in Berlin.
"With an expropriation, no new apartment is created, only the ownership structure changes," said Geywitz in an interview with the "Tagesspiegel" (Sunday).
My goal is to give tenants peace of mind that their rent will remain affordable for the next few years.
By the way, a colourful mix of for example private landlords, cooperatives or housing associations is actually the best protection against monopolisation.
In Berlin, the coalition of SPD, Greens and Left Party will set up an expert commission on how to deal with the result of the referendum.
However, if the situation does not improve, Geywitz did not rule out talks with the FDP in the traffic-light coalition on further tightening of the rental law.
The coalition agreement provides for a rent cap until 2029, a cap on rent increases in tight housing markets and the expansion of the rent index.
I will speak with the justice minister to implement this as soon as possible.
If the rental market does not improve, "we will talk to our coalition partners about further steps," said the SPD politician.
Hello, I wanted to order something and after a few days I noticed that I had forgotten the last step in the payment.
Unfortunately, the product is no longer available.
Do they know when it will be back in stock?
Or if it will come back again?
#PRS_ORG# with storage (180 x #NUMBER# cm)
The voucher sounds great
Then I solve the self-employed issue for the new order
Many thanks for the quick clarification!
If the lamp is sent in March, how long will the shipping take?
I have already cut myself on the finger
That's absolute cheek
At least 100 dead in Kentucky tornadoes
A devastating storm system has swept through the United States, producing numerous tornadoes.
More than 100 deaths could be reported in Kentucky alone.
The pictures from there reminded me of a war zone.
Tornadoes have caused severe damage in the United States on Saturday night, and may have killed up to 100 people.
The storms left behind a 320-mile-long trail of destruction, mainly in the state of Kentucky.
Its governor, Andy Beshear, said after a visit to the disaster zone that everything was gone everywhere the tornado had passed.
Houses, shops, government buildings - gone.
Parts of industrial plants, roofs are in the trees.
It is hard to imagine that this is possible.
He alone is counting up to 100 deaths in the state of Kentucky, the official figures are increasing by the hour.
Hello, I just saw that the Vitrine #NAME# is sold out.
That's very sad.
Is it still being produced?
Or is she completely out of stock?
Is it possible to order this cabinet in another country?
When do you report?
If the delivery cannot be made to my apartment, I must cancel the order!
I understand that, but can I order the ceiling and have it delivered to Germany, which is in the shopping cart?
I have returned an article via the contact form or a return request, and I would like to know if it has been received or processed, as I have not yet received a confirmation.
Companies pay for vaccinations and change advertising slogans
While the federal government continues to reject proposals for a vaccine bonus, companies in Austria have themselves taken the initiative and are offering their employees a cash bonus for getting vaccinated.
They are on a line with the social partners ÖGB and the Chamber of Commerce, which today called for financial incentives for vaccination.
The transformation of advertising slogans into vaccination calls - in German style - is also intended to increase the willingness to get vaccinated against Corona.
He has moved to a company over which he has complained.
That doesn't make his situation any better than yours.
Wait and drink tea.
It's been a year.
He has obviously not sewn on his old place and has been looking for something else.
You can do that too.
And that he didn't like you then: well, that's fine.
He didn't like his job either.
There are too many variables.
Please take the cancellation.
That will then be legally relevant.
I'm taking a screenshot.
Guten Tag - ich interessiere mich für den Esstisch von Boone, Weiß.
Is there also a 230cm version?
We offer all Smeg kitchen appliances and the corresponding accessories in our online shop kitchenpoint.de.
We generally check the quality and completeness of your order.
The new Smeg coffee vending machine brings freshly ground coffee into your kitchen or office.
The simple and reduced design, the plastic surface in matt colours combined with the matt-brushed stainless steel front make the new SMEG coffee machine with milk frother into a design object.
According to the reduced design, all functions such as grind size and water amount, as well as the choice between espresso, Americano, ristretto or a mild coffee can be selected with just four buttons.
Thanks to the steam nozzle, coffee milk and milk foam specialties can also be prepared.
Help with first own campaign
Boron for the sake of the world!
I'm currently running a group of 4 friends through the adventure Over the Dragon's Pass and want to seamlessly bring my heroes into a campaign specifically written for the players.
We are playing DSA 5.
The great arc is made, the villains and their motivations written, the individual acts imagined and now I'm writing the entry adventure and already stumbling over my own feet at the first encounter.
The premise is that the heroes are to transport a wagon of grain from Gratenfels to a small village near the Thuran Sea.
Here, the further development of the plot is to take place.
A few miles from the village, a group of goblins will ambush the hero and lure him into a trap.
I want to give the player characters the opportunity to solve the confrontation in different ways: to convince, to act, to threaten, to recognize the danger as early as possible, whatever the players may come up with.
Group size: 8 ordinary goblins, 2 with spears, 6 with bows and swords armed
The goblins lurk in wait for the heroes in a narrow path and flank them with three on the left and three on the right, armed with bows, while two with spears stop the wagon.
If it comes to a fight and the heroes lose, I have two solutions
1. The heroes are all made unconscious and subsequently found by the son of the village mayor, a half-elf, and healed.
Of course, the cart is gone.
2. If a defeat is unavoidable, then this half-elf with two of his companions jumps into the fray and helps the heroes in battle.
The cart is still there, everything is fine.
How appropriate is the Deus ex Machina of solution 2?
Is the encounter too much of an introduction to the adventure?
The goblin group will later play a crucial role, so it's not just cannon fodder.
EDIT: Wow, I didn't expect so many answers, especially not so many great suggestions and tips.
I will guarantee that many of your ideas will be implemented, and now I also have more confidence in my narratives.
I took the lamp apart again.
And again, stuck together.
Unfortunately, it still doesn't work.
Therefore, I would like to send them back
Can you then let the returns come in, then I can pack the lamp and bring it to the #PRS_ORG#.
Shipping costs and time saved - and at the same time the environment is spared!
If you need more than one article, please click "Pay now" only when you have all the articles in your shopping cart.
Therefore, the combi delivery is automatically calculated and you get everything in one package.
By doing this, you save yourself the multiple purchase/payment and the environment is happy because no unnecessary shipping material and unnecessary fuel for the delivery of several packages is used.
Faster shipping with DHL, DPD and Deutsche Post!
In general, we ship your order on the same business day if payment is received by 14:00.
To ensure that your package arrives as quickly as possible at your address, please make sure that your address is complete and that it is also on your mailbox and doorbell.
Would you like us to send your package to a pack station for you?
Then please choose DHL, because only DHL can deliver at DHL stations.
We will send you an email with the tracking number, if you have selected DHL or DPD as the shipper.
Therefore, you can already check around 22:00 to see where your package is.
Your satisfaction is our goal - all five stars count!
If you are satisfied with us, we would be happy if you would rate us positively and give us five stars for the detailed evaluations.
If it ever happens that not everything is to your full satisfaction, we would be grateful if you would contact us before you leave a review.
That's how we have the chance to make you happy.
We have nothing to do with the chair.
Suddenly there was a crack
I was just sitting there
Here was the lower part, so to speak, the part with the storage space damaged.
Will everything be collected again or only the storage space?
I'm sick of Sky Sport F1
Hello dear F1 fans, over the course of the season, the quality on German Sky has steadily declined, so I want to vent a little bit with this post.
First of all, the transmission was interrupted in the middle of the F2 race to start the F1 preview on time.
Although the schedule was far behind the plan due to the delayed start and the accident, it would still have been possible to show the last (planned) ten minutes as well as the championship decision!
Apparently, however, legal reasons mean that the F1 has priority and therefore everything else must be restricted, so that Sky DE here had no choice.
Still stupid, though, given that Sky UK broadcast the race to the end.
Nevertheless, a small compliment: the commentator Olivier Zwartyes has handled the difficult situation around the heavy accident well.
Then there was again rule ignorance by the commentators Sascha Roos and Ralf Schumacher, as both did not know that you can change the tyres under a red flag.
Although this situation has already occurred in Imola, Baku and Silverstone this year, both only came to the decision that Verstappen could change his tyres when there were corresponding radio messages to this effect to Hamilton.
Both commentators at Sky UK and RTL immediately knew that this was an option for Verstappen.
I think that such elementary rules should be known when commenting on a pay-TV channel for the Formula 1.
It is also not the first time that now, according to the rules, it is possible or required to ask questions, both have simply persistent uncertainties in the area of rules.
In general, I don't like the comment style of Roos, but I admit that it is a matter of taste.
But I find Heiko Wasser from RTL even more serious.
In addition, there are constant idiocies that both simply look unprofessional, like ordering coffee from (equally clueless) reporter Peter Hardenacke or "UuuuuHD" from Ralf Schumacher.
The latter, on the other hand, brings total chaos to the commentary, which he apparently does not take seriously.
Not least, the advertising simply takes over on Sky, in the final stretch, Sky is the only channel that goes into advertising, as can be heard on F1TV, where only the German soundtrack without commentary is available directly after the race.
Neither ServusTV nor ORF do this.
Both of these two channels make less advertising than Sky, and that as a free-to-air channel.
Glock and Baumgartner must be praised for their work, but this alone does not allow me to overlook the disadvantages.
The rest of Sky Sport F1's programme is also very thin on the ground and full of repeats.
Sky is really the worst German-speaking broadcaster to cover Formula 1.
Unironically, RTL does a better job of the four races they are allowed to broadcast, even without advertising.
So, at least, the grandiose F1 season is much less fun than it would be with a decent broadcaster.
I would like to know what you think.
For this: #PRS_ORG#-pendle lamp, brass and multicolored glass x 1
Hello, I have an article that was supposed to be delivered last week and is still not delivered.
I have contacted the chat twice and nothing.
The First Lady told me it would be sent out on Monday, the Second Lady told me yesterday that she would check and send an email, and she never did.
Hello, I ordered two #PRS_ORG# on 12.12.19.
One of them has already shown a defect (the material has a hole in the front part of the chair).
I ask for support.
Fan pumps are ideal for supplying additional oxygen to an aquarium.
It is also possible to operate a filter system using an air pump.
This series is offered in 3 variants by us.
Look at the table at the end of the offer.
Here you can see the services in comparison.
If the pumps are strong enough, you can run an entire facility with them.
If you have a large aquarium, pumps with 2 or more outlets are suitable, so that you can connect more than one outlet.
The MK series has one, two or four outlets, depending on the model, but also offers air pumps to set an accent in the aquarium, e.g. with an air curtain (available in our shop) or with a decoration that turns the air bubbles into a function.
Here, a treasure chest, a shell or something like that would be named.
The MK series has a special, sound-insulated construction that ensures low operating noise.
The installation is very easy.
The fan pump is connected to the exhaust pipe 4/6 mm via an air hose...and then it can go.
The fan pump should be the same or higher than the water level and should be mounted outside.
If the blower pump is set lower than the water level, a check valve should be inserted between the blower pump and the water level.
Just cut the air hose and put the valve in between.
This would prevent water from flowing backwards, which would cause the water in the basin to flow through the pump...
If the fan pump is to be installed outdoors, it should be covered and protected from moisture
The MK series pumps are pure power packages that consume little energy
Even though we state the processing time on eBay as 3 days, packages are packed and picked up daily.
Everything goes well on the way, it goes very quickly.
We just want to make sure that no one is confused, just because it took a little longer.
It would be so, not everyone has understanding for the whole staff, who also work in the logistics... of course, here the Corona doesn't stop.
Please do not rate it badly just because the delivery is delayed, that is entirely the fault of the parcel services.
Of course, people naturally complain about these services, even though we are saying...they've got it pretty bad right now.
This is also very different regionally.
Be kind to no one, stay healthy and we all hope that there will be better times ahead.
How long does it take to order the yellow ones with and without armrest?
Can you also order the legs in a bright colour here?
Amazon founder Bezos sends astronaut daughter and host into space
The daughter of the first American in space, a TV presenter and four other passengers have taken a short trip into space.
They were transported on Saturday by the rocket system "New Shepard" of the Blue Origin company, founded by Amazon founder Jeff Bezos.
The ten-minute flight took off and landed in the west of the US state of Texas.
Under a blue sky, Bezos personally welcomed the newly-minted astronauts upon their return.
"Welcome back," said Bezos, dressed in a blue spacesuit as he opened the hatch to the capsule.
Under the applause of friends, family members and Blue Origin employees, the six passengers climbed out one by one and hugged Amazon founder Jeff Bezos.
According to Blue Origin, they took ten minutes and 13 seconds to reach a height of 107 kilometers.
The 74-year-old Laura Shepard Churchley, daughter of the 1961 Nasa astronaut Alan Shepard (1923-1998), who was the first to fly into space, and the 50-year-old TV presenter Michael Strahan were guests of the company, while the other four passengers paid for their tickets: space engineer Dylan Taylor, investor Evan Dick, technology entrepreneur Lane Bess, and his son Cameron.
Blue Origin did not disclose how much each of them paid for their tickets.
Laura Shepard Churchley recalled her father's mission after the short flight.
He had to work hard and do everything himself on his missions.
She was just along for the ride, the 74-year-old said with a laugh.
Michael Strahan was also enthusiastic.
He would like to go back to space as soon as possible, said the moderator.
"New Shepard" flies up to 100 km
The rocket system "New Shepard" flies largely automatically.
The capsule separated from the rocket during the flight reached an altitude of around 100 kilometres above the Earth, briefly experiencing weightlessness, before the reusable object was slowed down by large parachutes and landed again.
The International Astronautical Federation and many other experts see 100 km above the Earth as the boundary between Earth and space, but there is no binding international regulation.
It was the third manned flight for Blue Origin: In July, Amazon founder Bezos was on board, together with his brother Mark, an 82-year-old former US pilot, and an 18-year-old Dutchman.
The second one in October was attended by the 90-year-old Canadian actor William Shatner, who became famous for his role as "Captain Kirk" in "Star Trek", as well as the former NASA engineer Chris Boshuizen, the entrepreneur Glen de Vries and the deputy chief of Blue Origin, Audrey Powers.
Critics accuse Bezos and Blue Origin of driving the space tourism business largely without scientific research interests for the benefit of humanity and without regard for the climate.
With a simple press of a button, you can easily choose whether your "Smart Stone" will glow permanently in one color or play through its entire color palette.
When placed on a color change, the lightstone maintains a light color for around one minute before gently transitioning to the next decorative tone.
The solid construction of the "Smart Stone" light is weatherproof all year round.
In snowy surroundings, their light shines particularly well - only with a shortened duration of light should be expected once the days become shorter.
Please make sure that no snow interferes with the function of the solar module in winter.
"Smart Stone" uses a NiMh battery in the common Mignon (AA) format, which can be easily replaced if necessary.
You can order a suitable replacement battery through our webshop and thus extend the service life of your Dekoleuchte even further.
High-gloss effect spray that makes smooth surfaces look like chrome.
Suitable for all smooth surfaces, especially for the design of rims, wheel covers, and plastic parts that can be painted after appropriate pretreatment.
With this product, DUPLI-COLOR is introducing for the first time a weatherproof and wipeable chrome spray.
The optimal effect is achieved on black backgrounds, e.g. by pre-priming with DUPLI-COLOR TUNING Effect Primer.
Available as a single dose and in a set including the Effect Primer and dust-binding cloth for optimal preparation of the coating.
For use on metal, wood, glass, lacquered hard plastics, stone.
Perfect, that's exactly what I need :) Do I need anything else?
They just need the tracking number in my mail?
Someone who works in biochemistry or is studying biochemistry
I am currently studying in the first semester of biochemistry and find the subject itself quite interesting, and I don't mind being in the lab (I have already completed the inorganic chemistry practical).
I have also been informed about career prospects before starting my studies, but at that time I also thought that I would definitely study until the doctorate and then work.
At the moment, however, I have doubts, especially depressing me are the job prospects.
On one side (Studycheck etc), one hears constantly about super job opportunities and the profession is totally in demand, on the other side, one hears constantly about unemployed biologists and incredibly poorly paid jobs.
So I would really like to know:
1) What is she currently working on?
2) Are you satisfied with your work/salary?
3) What have you studied/what training have you done?
4) Would you do it all over again?
Thank you for your answers!
I am currently really unsure and am thinking about breaking off my studies in 2022 and becoming a specialist in computer science.
If you have any experiences, you can also write them down :)
Extra stress during holidays and weekends
This topic came up last week with me.
But now I had to use my long weekend to relax.
That's why we're only now putting up a post for it.
Not only during big holidays, like Christmas holidays, there is a lot of stress in our business.
It seems that there are also plus days before holidays and bridge days.
It was like this: Last week was the Assumption of Mary, which is called "Auffahrt" in Switzerland.
On Friday, most people and businesses make a bridge day, which is semi-official.
Last week, it was a long 4-day weekend at home.
What happened last week?
Everywhere stress.
Lots of emails that had to be sent out before departure, assignments here and there, everything *absolutely* had to be done before the long weekend.
Because... well, why?
Because "next week" sounds so much and it shouldn't be like that?
Or because people really want to do as much in a shortened week as they would in a normal one?
Not only was I stressed on Wednesday, but I was also very agitated.
What is this self-imposed fasting for holidays?
Why do we still have holidays if we can't enjoy them properly?!
The stress didn't come from above, the colleagues were all completely self-sufficient.
My question is simply: Are only we Swiss like this?
Is this our Reformed-Evangelical style?
Or do you know that in the north as well?
Yvonne Catterfeld is looking forward to Christmas in Thuringia
Yvonne Catterfeld (42) is looking forward to Christmas in her home state of Thuringia - but has not yet received any gifts.
"The beauty, even if there is no snow in Erfurt, then one simply goes to Ilmenau in the Thuringian Forest," said the actress and singer Hit Radio FFH.
She will get ready for the party by baking and building with her son.
"I love it," said Catterfeld.
But until the happy days, she still has a lot to do: "For the first time, I haven't received any presents, I have to get going now."
NEKTON-Bio supports a smooth course of the moult and feather renewal.
NEKTON-Bio contains all essential vitamins, amino acids, minerals, trace elements and 200,000 µg of biotin/kg.
NEKTON-Bio gives the bird a smooth and shiny plumage.
The majority of feather damage in aviculture is exclusively caused by nutritional errors.
Since the plumage is made of protein-rich substances, a particularly rich and balanced protein diet for the bird is a prerequisite for the formation of a perfect feather coat.
For a functioning metabolism, the daily diet must contain sufficient vitamins, minerals and trace elements.
A large part of the animal losses that occur during the moult are due to a lack of or an unbalanced protein supply and/or a lack of vitamins and minerals.
The unfavorable amino acid ratio in most plant-based feeds is explicitly taken into account and balanced in the composition of NEKTON-Bio.
No other vitamin preparations should be administered during the application of NEKTON-Bio.
NEKTON Bio is cold water soluble and can be administered either through the drinking water or through the soft food.
Thank you, I found it
Unfortunately, it still doesn't work
DDR-Handarbeitsmodell Altbau E-Lok E 95 03 DRG/DR, the locomotive was in use in Silesia and Central Germany, the very rare locomotive probably comes from the conversion proposal of the model railway enthusiast ME Heft 11/1968, used with play tracks and missing parts, see photos, the E 95 series is a heavy freight electric locomotive of the Deutsche Reichsbahn-Gesellschaft (DRG), designed for the traction of heavy coal trains in the Silesian network, possibly the model comes from the small series manufacturer ZSCHUTSCHKE and BACHMANN.
A locomotive is on display at the DB Museum Halle (Saale) and has been restored.
The Deutsche Reichsbahn-Gesellschaft had the AEG commissioned in 1924 to submit proposals for an electric locomotive that should be able to transport 2,200-ton coal trains and 530-ton passenger trains at a speed of 45 km/h.
The maximum speed was 65 km/h.
Thus, the DRG decided in March 1926 to deliver the locomotive as 1'Co+Co1' with trolley-mounted drive AEG with the delivery of the mechanical part, and the Siemens-Schuckertwerke with the electrical part.
From December 1927 to June 1928, six locomotives were delivered, which received the operating numbers E 95 01–06.
All survived the Second World War and found themselves again on the territory of the future GDR.
In 1946, the locomotives were delivered as war reparations to the Soviet Union.
They returned to Germany until November 1952.
The assessment of the reparability of all six locomotives was carried out at the Reichsbahnausbesserungswerk Dessau.
[4] As the demand for locomotives for heavy freight service increased with the ongoing electrification of the central German network, the three locomotives E 95 01 to E 95 03 were refurbished in 1959, with the remaining machines serving as spare parts suppliers.
First, the E 04, E 44, and E 94, which were available in larger quantities, were preferred.
Only when it became clear that the E 94 would not be able to increase its throughput, did the E 95 come back into focus in the process of rehabilitation.
[4] First, the locomotives were stationed at the railway depot in Leipzig-Wahren.
They came to the railway workshop Halle P. in 1960.
They were used in their own circular plan, usually in front of coal trains from the Geiseltal heading towards Halle, Leipzig and Erfurt.
As the age of the locomotives increased, the complex control became problematic.
This often happened that marksmen got stuck in the act of pulling the trigger.
Then the man who was constantly riding on this locomotive had to use a hammer and a wooden chisel to loosen the bolts during the journey.
Damage to the traction motors occurred frequently and led to months of downtime for the locomotive.
[5] Since the end of the 1960s, there were enough new locomotives available and there was no plan to expand the electrical operation at that time, so the Reichsbahn was able to dispense with old locomotives and most of the splinter classes, so that the E 95 were taken out of service.
In addition, the Deutsche Reichsbahn wanted to operate only single-manned electric locomotives, which would have caused problems in train operation due to the aforementioned difficulties with the machines and the view from the driver's cab.
[5] After mid-1969, the E 95 02 and E 95 03 were withdrawn, followed by the E 95 01, which retired on October 5, 1970.
The intended new designation 255 001 was thus never used.
All the locomotives except E 95 02 have been dismantled.
The E 95 02 was installed as a replacement for the future museum locomotive E 77 10 as a switch heating installation at the main station in Halle.
It took some time before the responsible people at the Reichsbahn were convinced that the E 95 was worth saving as a museum locomotive.
In 1979, the initial external restoration of the locomotive began with the goal of presenting it at a vehicle show at the RAW Dessau.
[5] Since then, it has been part of the Dresden Transport Museum as a non-operational museum locomotive.
In 1986, the internal completion of the locomotive was completed.
The locomotive is museum-worthy at the DB Museum Halle (Saale).
Since 1995, employees of the tradition association Bw Halle P have been working on the operational rehabilitation of the locomotive.
In April 2015, the locomotive was able to be presented for the first time at an exhibition in the museum workshop Arnstadt with its new inner and outer coating, where the transformers were checked and five traction motors were operational.
-The locomotives were in use on the Silesian Mountain Railway and the branch lines until 1945, where they proved their reliability and low maintenance requirements.
In February 1945, the machines were relocated to the central German network in Leipzig.
The main area of operation was initially Silesia
Hand-made model H0 in OVP, functioning well, optical repairs are necessary on the locomotive in self-made, dusty, with play tracks, cellar smell !!!, very rare hand-made model, very small edition, possibly the building set also comes from the small series company ZSCHUTSCHKE and BACHMANN
The packaging may have labels and storage marks.
Yes, the F-parts are it
I received a bed from you.
However, there were problems with one part.
The middle beam is held up by two feet...unfortunately, these are too narrow and the beam cannot be mounted on the feet.
What are we doing now?
I can't build the bed.
The middle beam is held up by two feet, unfortunately these are faulty.
The middle beam doesn't fit into the intended hanger.
So I get new ones sent to me.
When will they be released?
No, no flat ones.
According to the assembly instructions, these are the correct ones, they were only too narrow
But that's not important.
As long as they fulfill their purpose
They are not flat for me
Could I get this sent to me?
Hello #NAME#, can I explain the problem to you again?
Residential fire with two light injuries and high damage
Two people were slightly injured in a fire in a residential house in Upper Bavaria.
In addition, an estimated damage of six-figure Euro amounts has been incurred, the police reported on Sunday.
The fire had probably spread from a carport to the adjacent residential building in Kinsau (district of Landsberg am Lech).
Two residents were reportedly taken to the hospital on Sunday with mild smoke inhalation.
The exact cause of the fire was not known at first, but the police did not assume a deliberate act of arson.
The Fürstenfeldbruck Criminal Police have taken over the further investigations.
But it comes later
And I have to pay shipping costs again
To debunk fake news - Biontech CEO publishes vaccine photo
Uğur Şahin published a photo of his first vaccination on the social network "LinkedIn" in early 2021
Biontech CEO Uğur Şahin has not previously spoken publicly about his vaccination status.
Now the entrepreneur has published a photo showing his Corona vaccination.
The illness of a friend prompted Şahin to share.
The CEO and co-founder of the Mainz-based company Biontech, Uğur Şahin, has published a photo showing how he receives a coronavirus vaccine.
On social media, there were false claims that I was not vaccinated.
In fact, my wife and I have received three doses of the Biontech-Pfizer vaccine," Şahin wrote in a post on the LinkedIn network on Friday.
"For the past few months, my friends have been urging me to post a photo of me getting vaccinated to combat these false rumors."
So far, he has rejected it because the communication should not revolve around him.
But a call in the past week has changed his mind: "I was deeply saddened to learn that an old school friend of mine is currently fighting for his life.
He is fighting a severe Covid-19 infection and has been on a ventilator for three weeks.
The school friend and his family were not vaccinated, Şahin wrote.
He did not ask for the reasons.
"The most common cause, however, appears to be fear, which is often fueled by misinformation and mistrust."
Fear can only be fought with facts to a limited extent. Sometimes it is better to share personal experiences.
An interview with Deutsche Welle is circulating on the internet in which Uğur Şahin says he is not vaccinated.
However, the video was created in December 2020, as the Deutsche Welle itself clarified.
"I am currently not allowed to get the vaccine myself," Şahin said at the time.
There is a priority in Germany for the vaccination against the virus.
Now, the prioritisation has been cancelled for a long time - and Biontech's CEO has been vaccinated three times according to his own statements.
Fire in transformer station: Hundreds of thousands of people without power
In several municipalities in North Rhine-Westphalia, the lights went out on Friday evening: no electricity and in many cases no heating either.
A fire had disabled a transformer station.
Thousands of people in the Rhein-Sieg-Kreis in North Rhine-Westphalia had to go without power for around 24 hours after a fire with severe damage in a transformer station.
On Friday evening, 41,000 residents and residents in several towns turned off the lights due to the fire.
Westnetz reported that numerous emergency power generators were in operation on Saturday until the widespread outage was finally resolved late in the evening.
Firefighters and helpers and helpers from the THW provided assistance in the municipalities.
Authorities offered care facilities in schools and called for help from neighbors.
The supplier thanked the affected parties for their patience and the helpers for their efforts.
We are very aware that the last 24 hours have brought significant restrictions.
We also thank the affected municipalities, the district, the fire departments and the THW for their tireless efforts," said the head of the primary technology area, Florian Witt, in a statement on Saturday evening.
The repairs to the damage will take a few more days, as the Westnet technicians were only able to restore some of the lines temporarily, he explained.
According to the company, the fire was caused by a technical defect.
Electricity is flowing again
The fire that broke out at 7:15 pm on Friday has severely damaged parts of the 10,000-volt switchgear at the Neunkirchen-Seelscheid substation, according to Westnetz.
There would be extensive cleaning and repair work to be carried out.
In parallel, a connection to a 30,000-volt power supply level has been created.
With this bypass, the power supply is restored.
Since Saturday 6 p.m., over 21,000 people in Much and Ruppichteroth have had electricity again.
Another 20,000 residents of Neunkirchen-Seelscheid were gradually connected from 21.30.
Since 23:15, the last of the affected people have also had power.
Over 80 Westnetz and partner company employees were on the scene.
The authorities had called for neighbourhood assistance after setting up a backup power supply for important buildings on Saturday afternoon.
"It is now important that citizens look after older or single people in their neighbourhood and report to the local fire station if help is needed," explained Landrat Sebastian Schuster (CDU) after a crisis meeting.
The focus was on the residents of nursing homes when setting up and operating emergency power generators.
In addition, temporary care facilities have been set up in schools for those people who were unable to care for themselves or who needed medical equipment that was dependent on electricity or who were dependent on medical care.
Guten Tag!
Unfortunately, the ceiling in Germany is sold out.
Can I buy them from you and pay in euros?
It is the daily cover #PRS_ORG# in blue-green.
I hope you have a good day and stay healthy ♡
But I can't mount the underframe on the table top.
It is Custom #NAME#.
There are three versions of this.
We wanted those with table plates with a diameter of #NUMBER#.
We received a diameter of 155 cm.
Today my #PRS_ORG# came, but I can't fit it together and thus shorten it.
Can you help me further?
Otherwise I would have to return them, because otherwise they would not be suitable for the purpose.
I would appreciate a reply
Yes, that's really easy!
Then we do it!
Can you send me the return receipt by email?
The repair is now complete.
I had already tried this before the chat.
However, I did not restart the E-#PRS_ORG# before the purchase.
Should I do this now?
I find it almost insulting to get such a low discount.
We are not in agreement with that
Nordic combined: Kombiner Riiber wins
The German Nordic combiners Fabian Rießle and Julian Schmid have sprinted to the podium at the World Cup in Otepää, Estonia.
The duo had to concede defeat once again to the outstanding Norwegian Jarl Magnus Riiber, who had already started with a big lead after the ski jumping.
Return of order #NUMBER#
When will the money be transferred back to my account?
Yes, we both made a new one and use version 4.5...
It could be that they have heard of the problem before
I bought a book directly with my #PRS_ORG#, it seems to be on there too.
When I try to open it, the message pops up, ups!
This document could not be opened.
The file may be faulty, please report it to the customer service.
As far as I can tell it is a #PRS_ORG# epub file.
Can you help me further?
Chat connection is down and now?
I also have to work in between!
To ensure a uniform and clean paint job, you should clean the parts with a little soap and water, rinse with clear water, and dry them thoroughly.
Before you use the brush for the first time with a new color, it is recommended to practice 2 to 3 strokes.
You can do this on the inside of the parts that are not visible or on a yogurt cup.
The first mark on the building component
Draw the brush in a straight line, stroke by stroke.
Later, the overlapping of the color layers results in a uniform surface.
Avoid quick back-and-forth wiping with the brush.
This results in unrealistic areas.
A model is not a garden fence.
Start with the bright colours.
The dark ones could otherwise later show through.
Metallic tones and metallic colours come in at the end with a separate brush.
Otherwise, it can result in unsightly metal flecks when mixed with normal colours.
Let the painted parts dry for a day before varnishing.
The models achieve an authentic appearance through decals or stickers.
From national symbols on aircraft to ship names, to decals and markings on car models: the decals give the model the final touch.
Bring the decals in the correct order as you can still reach the parts.
A cockpit can be more easily cleaned before it is installed in the fuselage.
More important than the right tool, such as scissors, tweezers and a toothpick, is time, patience and a steady hand.
Cut out each decal individually and arrange them as needed.
Decals are also called water slide decals because you briefly wet the back of them with water until the backing paper turns dark.
Then you just move the picture a little bit on the paper and place the piece on the corresponding place on the model (which you also moistened beforehand).
While you hold the decal in place on the model with a tool, you pull the backing paper away from the side.
Attention: Prüfe immer erst, ob das Bild richtig sitzt, bevor Du es komplett vom Papier schiebst, damit es nicht am Finger klebt, knistert oder gar reißt.
Excess water is absorbed with a household towel.
Not suitable for children under 3 years
I can only briefly open a book when I look for something else, then I no longer read the book and have to log out and log back in and load the book again and search for the place where I left off.
On Saturday, I already communicated with you.
Can I get this by email?
For all 3 packages?
Because the lamp came in 3 separate packages to me
Thank you anyway!
Then I'll buy elsewhere once the money is returned.
But can I get it back problem-free?
Infertility treatment with PKV / What is a "insurance case"?
Hello everyone,
We were for some time in fertility treatment, now that it comes to the settlement with the PKV, this suddenly gets in the way.
In order:
We had applied for the fertility treatment at the PKV in advance and received the approval over 3 attempts.
The experiments were not in any way (e.g. time frame, success, etc.) restricted.
The first attempt led directly to a successful pregnancy and birth and was credited to the PKV.
Some time later, we tried to have another child, and we carried out 2 (unsuccessful) attempts, but we have not yet counted these towards the PKV.
We applied again for reimbursement from the PKV and were again granted 3 more attempts.
After some further attempts (we have conducted more attempts than agreed, logically the most expensive ones should be covered by the PKV), we submitted the invoices to the PKV and received the bad surprise: instead of 5 attempts (2+3), the PKV only wants to cover 3 attempts.
The reason: With pregnancy/birth, the remaining two attempts of the first promise are voided.
The second child wish is a new insurance case.
However, according to the AGB, "The insurance case begins with the treatment and ends when treatment is no longer required."
The questions to the experts in the round here:
* Who has the right to claim PKV (only 3 attempts are reimbursed) or we (5 attempts to be reimbursed)?
* Had the PKV not pointed out to us that with a birth the further attempts would fail?
* Is the desire for a second child really a new insurance case?
Infertility (due to blocked fallopian tubes) is not cured by having a child.
It would be great if the experts here could give their opinion.
Thank you very much for your help!
Could you please send me the three variants by email and tell me how I can reach them best?
Okay.
We will no longer order anything from them.
If they add up the sales of me and my friend #NAME# (same address), they have obviously lost a good customer.
They can pass this on to their manager if they wish.
That's not competitive.
Yesterday, my colleague told me that the return was requested and now you're telling me that I have to return the thing.
I can't do anything about the fact that the wardrobe arrives at my place completely messed up
Please see the screenshot to see what the colleague wrote
It is clear and clear that the repayment was triggered and I have still not received any repayment via #PRS_ORG#
They can tell their manager that they've lost two regulars.
My friend has also ordered various furniture for our apartment through his account.
We will not do that anymore.
No, the defect only appeared after a few months.
A desk chair must be able to withstand normal use.
Otherwise, they can't sell him as a desk chair.
Regardless of this, the warranty period of 24 months applies.
No, I am not able to obtain another type of packaging.
I will dismantle the cabinet and make it available to the transport company.
Guten Tag, ich habe eine Frage zu Ihrer Serie von #PRS_ORG#
These products are advertised with additional hooks, which we unfortunately cannot find with you.
Can they help?
Topic of the week: The best low budget films
What a low-budget film is, there is no general definition with exact budget limits.
Wikipedia has this to say about it:
A **low-budget film** or **low-budget movie** is a motion picture shot with little to no funding from a major film studio or private investor.
There are plenty of lists of low-budget films online, such as on Letterboxd.com.
Do you know interesting representatives of this category?
What interests you about that?
And what do you perhaps not like at all?
I am a very good customer of yours, and have already completely furnished 2 apartments with your furniture.
Wanted to ask the best price for the gray leather sofa Odelle.
The delivery time has now been extended again, is this now also reliable?
Thank you
Yours sincerely
There is no phone number, a chat where you have to wait 30 minutes is not a chat!
Unfortunately, nothing changes at the waiting position...I give up again, because it just doesn't work here.
Hello
"Half victory" against Belarus with high costs for the EU
According to political expert Raphael Bossong, the EU can declare a "half victory" in the conflict with the Belarusian regime.
However, the costs are very high and mean massive violations of the rights of migrants and refugees at the border with Poland and Lithuania," Bossong told the Evangelical Press Service (epd).
The EU has not been able to resolve the confrontation, the researcher of the Berlin Foundation for Science and Politics (SWP) explained.
This state of suspension - Belarus is not giving up at all, but the EU feels like a winner - is likely to continue for some time.
The treatment of people at the border was not in line with the European Convention on Human Rights, Bossong concluded.
Apparently, there is a "growing normalization of pushbacks" by individual EU governments.
Since the EU as a whole is not determined against it, this goes at the expense of basic rights.
This development also weakens the unity of the Union.
"It can't seem to get through when a member state sets its mind on doing its own thing," as is currently the case with Poland, which does not even allow Frontex, the EU border protection agency, access to its borders.
In addition, the EU pays a further price for its policy at the border with Belarus, as Bossong explains: The principle of asylum policy has been made more difficult, as the line "border protection, border protection, border protection" has been strengthened.
Another attempt to cross the border
According to reports from Poland's border guard, migrants have again attempted to cross into Polish territory from Belarus.
55 migrants were arrested overnight on Sunday and returned to the border, a spokeswoman for the authority said on Sunday.
The Polish officials were pelted with stones by the migrants near the village of Czeremsza.
According to reports, a soldier was hit in the face and had to be medically treated by a military doctor.
A total of 52 attempted border crossings were registered within 24 hours.
On Friday evening, a group of 28 migrants had already broken through the border barriers.
Thousands of people from countries like Iraq and Afghanistan have crossed the border between Belarus and the EU in the past months or attempted to do so.
The EU accuses Alexander Lukashenko of luring Belarusian citizens with the promise of entry into the EU.
According to reports, Poland and Lithuania have sealed off border crossings.
The EU sanctioned Belarus and threatened airlines that brought migrants and refugees into the country.
In addition, EU commissioners travel to the countries of origin of the people to prevent them from leaving.
The most effective element of the EU's reaction is the pressure on the airlines, said Bossong.
"The EU has thrown its market power into the balance and demonstrated its resolve with hard bandages and extraterritorial sanctions."
Minsk must also take into account the internal political costs.
The Belarusian society is probably not set up to allow the security apparatus to pass thousands of people through the country on a regular basis.
Mercedes protests after controversial Formula 1 finale
According to Mercedes, Max Verstappen committed two rule violations during the race.
Abu Dhabi - After the controversial Formula 1 finale in Abu Dhabi, Mercedes has filed an appeal.
The Silver Arrows suspect two rule breaches in the last Grand Prix of the year.
A protest relates to a supposed breach of the rules by Max Verstappen in the Red Bull during the last Safety Car phase, when he is alleged to have overtaken illegally.
A second appeal was lodged against the classification at the end of the race.
According to Mercedes, the protocol was not followed correctly.
Verstappen overtook Lewis Hamilton in the Mercedes on the last lap to claim his first Formula 1 title.
The manoeuvre took place shortly after the end of a Safety Car phase, in which the Dutchman had overtaken the car in front of him.
I'll check that.
I spoke with the bank and reported myself to you again
Thank you for the support
Free admission for members: Europa-Park hosts SC Freiburg fantag
The Europa-Park, the namesake of the Europa-Park Stadium of the Sport-Club Freiburg, has invited the SC Freiburg fans.
According to the park, members and permanent card holders of the Sport-Club from the Breisgau region, as well as members of the fan community, were allowed to visit the Europa-Park for free on that day.
In addition, there were coupons for drinks and sausages.
On this day, the roller coaster trains shone through the jerseys red and white.
Füchsle, the Euromouse and many red-and-white balloons provided the perfect backdrop," the park said.
The cooperation between the Bundesliga club and the amusement park in Rust, 40 kilometres north of Freiburg, has existed since the early 1990s.
The first SC Freiburg Fantag in the Europa-Park has again shown how well the partnership fits.
Seeing the shining fans having fun together on the roller coaster confirms this," says Europa-Park owner Jürgen Mack.
Why is it €#NUMBER# and not like originally 1699€?
Stages in the career of the new world champion Verstappen
The Dutchman Max Verstappen is the new Formula 1 world champion.
Max Verstappen has succeeded.
The Dutchman has won his first world championship title with Red Bull in his seventh year in Formula 1.
His path to the top of the king class:
Abu Dhabi - 2012, Italy: Verstappen lost the karting world championship after a crash in Sarno.
Father Jos Verstappen made him wait at a gas station on the way back, annoyed.
His mother Sophie Kumpen is collecting the teenager in the following car.
2014, England: Red Bull's junior team received a promising young talent in Verstappen.
The 16-year-old is following in the footsteps of Sebastian Vettel and Daniel Ricciardo.
He then continued to drive in European Formula 3 for a while.
2015, Australia: Verstappen started at the age of 17 years and 166 days as the youngest pilot in history to start a Grand Prix.
Due to a defect, he had to prematurely retire his Toro Rosso in Melbourne.
2015, Malaysia: The then Toro Rosso driver Verstappen was 17 years and 180 days old, making him the youngest Formula 1 driver to score points.
Verstappen finished seventh in Sepang at the Malaysian Grand Prix.
2016, Spain: In his first race for Red Bull, Verstappen wins.
Aged 18 years and 228 days, he will become the youngest Formula 1 Grand Prix winner in history in Barcelona.
2019, Hungary: Verstappen celebrates his pole position in Budapest - he is not the youngest.
At the age of 21, he leaves behind Valtteri Bottas and his Mercedes team-mate Lewis Hamilton.
2021, Abu Dhabi: The summit has been reached.
Verstappen celebrates his first Formula 1 world title at the Abu Dhabi finale at the age of 24 - with a overtake against Hamilton in the final round. dpa
I had already had #NUMBER# with you when I ordered the #PRS_ORG# commode.
Judith Hermann read from her novel "Daheim"
As part of the reading series "LiteraTour Nord", author Judith Hermann read from her current novel "Daheim" on Friday at the sold-out Blue Note and served as a moderator.
She is divorced, lives in a house by the coast and listens sensitively to the nocturnal sounds at her front door.
I left a contact form to return an article yesterday, but have not received any email confirmation or similar.
My question is whether my request has been processed.
Not everyone has the time for your deranged chat and cheap Chinese goods.
Their mistake, which they corrected and not all from our household.
Contact Ms #NAME#.
I can't chat with them every day
We chatted yesterday and agreed that I or Mrs #NAME# would receive an email with a £60 voucher, a repeat order of the #PRS_ORG# nightstand and a return postage label.
This email has not yet been received.
The package is still to be delivered to #PRS_ORG# today.
Please contact me
Best regards
The LokSound 5 decoder can output up to 10 channels simultaneously.
Each channel can be decoded up to 16 bits / 31250 kHz and offers finally HiFi quality on your system.
It is practically no different from the original.
A Class-D audio power amplifier with up to 3W output power controls the speakers with an impedance between 4 Ohm and 32 Ohm.
The huge 128 Mbit sound buffer provides enough capacity.
All individual sounds can be adjusted in volume.
The super-flexible sound engine without a rigid timetable allows for the exact simulation of all conceivable rail vehicles.
Three independently adjustable braking functions and two alternative load scenarios give you maximum control over your vehicles.
Sorry but just because he says he's not an antisemite doesn't mean anything.
It's like when Afdler says he has no problem with foreigners.
Neither of them will admit it.
But Kollegah constantly reproduces anti-Semitic messages.
If you want to distance yourself, then you should just do it completely.
Yes, wow, then you're just as unserious as Kollegah.
Anyone who seriously questions evolution is completely lost.
Somehow a god has set it all in motion.
But once you become a creationist, you must believe that the earth is 10,000 years old and that science is just nonsense.
And that makes you a science denier and not to be taken seriously like Kollegah
To achieve an optimal field of vision, the lens should be brought as close as possible to the eye.
The specially designed aplanatic-achromatic lens system allows you to use the loupe practically without distortion and color errors even in the edge zone.
Lenses are often marked with magnification figures.
However, these figures only apply to precisely defined conditions, which rarely correspond to the usage conditions.
In order to make the most of your loupe, we ask you to pay attention to the information in the table "Technical data" (see instructions for use in the packaging).
Light reflections occur on the surfaces of all optical devices - including telescopes - and also on impact lenses.
By applying an anti-reflection coating, these reflections are significantly reduced.
Reflections on the lens surfaces are less noticeable when using the lens in optimal usage conditions - the lens close to the eye.
Further information can be found in the accompanying user manual (available in German and English).
Zeiss VisuCard Lupe Scheckkartenlupe Vergrößerung Taschenlupe Leselupe Lesehilfe
Whether as a reading aid on the go or simply for everyday use: The Zeiss VisuCard is the ideal helper, as it can be taken anywhere thanks to its handy format.
And its hard shell makes it robust against special stresses of the old age.
Every loupe comes with a credit card case for storage and safe transport.
They offer these parts, which you can see in the pictures or under "What do you offer" described.
What condition is the offered article in?
Of course, everyone can make a mistake once in a while, but if this happens, just write a message and it will be resolved to your satisfaction (either by exchange, partial refund or full refund).
They receive a proper invoice.
It is always sent, unless otherwise requested by the buyer, with tracking number per DHL!
Please refer to the above shipping conditions for the individual shipping costs.
There are no further handling costs.
ok, say all authorized, how can I check it more precisely?
Yes, both email addresses
#PRS_ORG# will do very nice and good service, although it took a while until a person could be reached, you were super
Hello dear #PRS_ORG# team,
I have already reported to you under the customer contact with the number #PHONENUMBER#.
Yes, but it was called something else before.
They cannot be delivered from England due to #PRS_ORG#.
Christmas tree sales in Schönwolde: In the town of Krembz, women are looking for Christmas trees
Farmer Frank Diers has already experienced many curious situations when selling Christmas trees.
Once a man even drove home alone because he and his partner could not agree.
Every year, he plants about 2000 of them.
The 56-year-old has already experienced so many curious situations.
That makes the run-up to Christmas always a bit funny, he says.
And with the voucher?
Otherwise, I'm out as a customer?!
After all, I received a defective delivery and now I have to pay the full price for it.
Then I will also evaluate it accordingly!
We don't need to discuss which court is better, but there is a certain similarity between the two.
Both consist of meat that is grilled on a rotating spit.
And both have therefore their name.
In German, an equivalent might be something like the "spinner," which doesn't sound nearly as appetizing.
Problems with fiber optic + Devolo DLan/Magic
We have had a new fibre optic connection in the house for a few weeks.
Unfortunately, I have problems building a stable WiFi network.
Previously, I had a DSL 50 Mbit connection and used Devolo DLan, which received and sent 50 Mbit flawlessly, except for a few glitches.
The new fiber optic connection sends 500 Mbit to the FritzBox 7590 and the DLAN module connected to the FritzBox also receives these.
However, the other DLan module, which sends the WiFi, does not send out the full 500 anymore, but the further away I get from the module, the less comes through (so use a power strip that is 1, 2, 3, etc. rooms away from the other module).
This leads to the fact that the Internet with the new fiber optic connection is now even slower on the first floor than before (~45 Mbit).
I have also ordered a new Devolo Magic set, which apparently uses a new technology.
This was slightly better than the DLan, but here too there were similar large losses.
Could someone explain why so much internet speed is lost over the power line?
And is LAN really the only solution?
It would be extremely time-consuming to run LAN cables in the house.
I am really desperate, which is why I have created an extra account here.
Therefore, I would be very interested in an answer.
When it's time to switch your current account
Who would have thought that now there would be peace at the Giro accounts, one is disappointed.
While many banks have used the autumn to confirm to their customers the fee hikes of the past with all sorts of tricks, the free allowances for negative interest rates continue to fall.
For example, Deutsche Bank was considered relatively generous with a limit of 100,000 euros for a long time.
Now she has halved the free bet and even quartered the daily stake.
In the first step, the limit was only lowered for customers of the Postbank division of the group - to 50,000 euros for current and investment accounts and to 25,000 euros for savings accounts.
However, the lower free bets now apply to the entire Deutsche Bank, as a spokesperson confirmed in response to a request.
And not only for new contracts, but also for "new individual agreements with existing customers".
The Commerzbank had already gone down to a limit of 50,000 euros before, which still applies, as does the limit at ING Deutschland.
The direct bank DKB, which is popular with cost-conscious customers, has reduced the free amounts in two stages, initially to 50,000 euros, and now to 25,000 euros.
After all, more than 100 banks now have a minimum interest rate of 25,000 euros or less, according to figures from the internet portal Verivox.
The Sparda Bank Berlin has also arrived at 25,000 euros: However, there is still a legal dispute with the consumer centers, which have already won the first instance against this regulation at the Berlin Land Court.
Now banks are discussing whether the institutes should set aside provisions - in the event that the higher courts ultimately declare the negative interest rates in principle to be unlawful and many millions of bank customers must be paid back.
Instead of the table for 6 people, they delivered the table for 8 people.
The undercarriage is for 6 people.
Jennifer Aniston has a whole beauty army
She now stands officially at the top of Hollywood.
But their lives are like a mountain and valley journey.
Jennifer Aniston (52) was voted the most influential woman of the year by the US magazine "The Hollywood Reporter".
For those who made a splash in 2021 with the "Friends" reunion and the continuation of their series "The Morning Show," this success is primarily the result of a lot of discipline and hard work.
Their appearance is taken care of by an army of assistants, stylists and trainers.
After all, so Aniston, she allows herself a chip a day (yes, correctly read: a single chip from the bag).
That the hearts of the female and male fans still fly equally is actually a miracle.
Maybe because she just has bad luck with love - and is still looking for the big love.
And the baby wish has been removed from the list.
She was constantly asked when she would become a mother.
That hurt her.
The people who asked me that have no idea what's going on with me personally, medically, why I can't.
It was really hurtful.
It remains to be hoped that success and fame will also bring happiness.
A disgraceful end to a career: Räikkönen must retire
Kimi Räikkönen's departure from Formula 1 was quieter than expected.
Abu Dhabi - The 42-year-old Finn took off his gloves and wiped sweat from his forehead.
That was it.
After a driving error and a slight contact with the barrier, Räikkönen had to stop his Alfa Romeo after only half the race distance at the Grand Prix of Abu Dhabi.
It was his 349th and last Grand Prix, the "Iceman" ended his career in the motorsport royal class.
His wife Minttu and the two children also traveled to the United Arab Emirates for his farewell.
Raikkonen's greatest success was winning the 2007 World Championship in a Ferrari.
He won 21 Grand Prix races, started 18 times from pole and came on the podium 103 times. dpa
Friedrich wins 60th World Cup - Nolte wins two-man bob - Sport
The brand of the Norwegian biathlete Ole Einar Björndalen with 94 successes is the goal of the bob pilot.
"I have calculated it through, I would have to win nine and a half races per season in order to make it to Cortina 2026," said the double Olympic champion from BSC Oberbärenburg, who recorded two victories in two days at the races in Winterberg.
First, he defended against the attack of Johannes Lochner by five hundredths of a second, in which he moved from third place to first.
Then he changed something in the material setting and drove on Sunday with 0.30 seconds a larger lead.
With his team Thorsten Margis (SV Halle), Candy Bauer (BSC Oberbärenburg) and Alexander Schüller (SV Halle), he beat the Brit Brad Hall.
Third place went to the Austrian Benjamin Maier.
"We took a bigger risk today and were rewarded," said Friedrich, who also reached his 22nd consecutive victory.
Johannes Lochner, who was driving to Stuttgart, came fifth this time after finishing second in the previous race.
Christoph Hafer from the BC Bad Feilnbach landed in fourth place in the first race and in eighth place.
"If I knew what he did differently, I would do it the same way," said Lochner.
Nolte wins at home - podium for Jamanka
Laura Nolte won her third season victory in the two-woman bob at home.
After fourth place on the previous day, she raced to victory in the German three-way success with pusher Deborah Levi on Sunday.
Olympic two-man bob champion Mariama Jamanka from the BRC Thuringia came in second with Germany's fastest sprinter, Alexandra Burghardt from Burghausen.
She also booked her first podium in this winter, in addition to her Olympic qualification.
The Wiesbadener Kim Kalicki landed in third place with Leonie Fiebig.
For me, it was super cool to be on the first podium in the World Cup, I am super happy that Mariama is taking part.
I'm super happy with the development.
There is still a lot of potential at the start, but the start times today were okay," said Burghardt and emphasized: "It's not just pushing, but there is also a lot to do around it."
Jamanka was a little annoyed about the not quite error-free trips, but said: "It's going in the right direction."
I had the blanket already in my shopping cart and could now buy it!!!
What should I do?
I haven't received it yet, so I haven't been able to redeem it, which is why I finally asked about it.
Last year, due to Corona, I had completely different problems and never had time for it.
And now it was said that it was expired, which made me very angry.
Look in the chat, it was about the Asare chair.
I would like to return it and then order it again because it is currently reduced :)
Why is the shipping only starting on March 16?
There was nothing on your website about such a long delivery time
No, only when I click on it do I get an extra field with the message.
It was taken from her yesterday by her colleague.
Why is this a problem today
I have also sent you pictures of the wrong delivery.
But we still want the shelf module, namely a new, undamaged one.
And not the whole order.
Only this day, only this week, only until XY...
Hello dear lovely girls and girls and women,
I have a lot of things I just want to write and maybe one or the other will like it...
I'm 24, have kPTBS, full-time student, and dog mom - aside from the fact that my dog doesn't bark or go to kindergarten, he's basically 1 to 1 my child.
My friend (since 6J together) is sick, has a second-degree burn on Monday and has been depressed for years (but is now in therapy).
Yesterday I visited him because I have emotional needs too and because I want to see and feel him, we cuddled a lot and it was nice.
I helped him with the shower (because my hand is in a cast due to a burn).
He is also cold and we see each other less (1-2x a week) which makes it very difficult for me with my needs for affection and love.
My dog has just had an upset stomach, so I cooked for him and now he's snuggled up in his blanket and is feeling a bit more relaxed after I warmed him with the heat lamp and petted him.
I live alone with my sister and my mother, and she's away for a month.
Now we also have to do our homework, which we of course divide between us.
But cooking itself is just so much work...
My PTBS illness is currently well managed, I am half-way through therapy and I am coping.
Not good, but I'm getting better and am almost symptom-free.
My university is demanding a lot (for me), tomorrow at 3 pm I have a written test for which I haven't done anything yet, and the day after tomorrow I have an anatomy class for which I should at least prepare a little.
And next week I have an oral exam on Tuesday, and what comes after that is in my calendar and not in my head because there is no space left.
So my week goes: Only until tomorrow, then it's the weekend.
But after that, what happens?
Only until the birthday.
Only until the beginning of the holidays.
Only until the weekend.
Only until...
And so it goes on forever.
I think I'm just stressed out enough that I need these mental anchors, otherwise I'm just going to pack it in.
Somehow I feel guilty and "chaotic," but I can't do it any other way...
Do you feel the same way?
Ehrlich, I am infinitely grateful that I don't have to work.
I can't even put into words how grateful I am.
I don't know if I would have survived my kptbs otherwise.
I think that has a lot to do with the mental load of women and that's why I thought I would find kindred spirits here...
I wish you all a restful evening, the week is almost over!
I received my order today, unfortunately the whole thing is another colour plus surface is scratched and the table leg has an imprint.
The first delivery was exactly as shown on the website.
We are very disappointed!!!!
What can you offer me?
If we switch tables now, I'll get another color or something?
The cancellation email was sent on 26.12.#NUMBER#.
In fact, twice.
However, it is not confirmed.
Something completely different: I noticed in school that many religious teachers do not believe in God and for them it is just another subject like maths or geography.
For me, it has always been a bit strange, maybe because I was raised Christian and I always believed in some way.
How do you stand on this?
Maybe you can tell a story about work or study colleagues with different attitudes.
In general, I understand the difference between private and professional and it is useful to separate them.
It also has a curriculum, etc.
But it would also be strange to have a physics teacher who doesn't believe in the theory of relativity.
What would make someone want to teach religion if they don't believe in it?
Culture preserve or something?
I hope your question is not too personal.
Can it be changed or not? Write in English, I understand it well
That's already very long, then I would like to avoid it
That's good, thank you.
I expect to receive a reply as soon as possible, at the latest by the beginning of next week.
Thanks for your support #NAME#.
Help with film search
Hello dear people,
I'm looking for a film from my childhood (I'm 24).
I think it was a film for teenagers.
The film has two timelines (or parallel worlds).
First, the modern (real world).
And the past (or the kingdom of the dead) (not quite sure).
Since I can't describe it in the real world, there is a young woman.
And in the land of the dead, a young soldier (uniform similar to those of the soldiers in Pirates of the Caribbean).
For some reason, the paths cross and a story is created.
The antagonist is also a soldier from the Reich of the Dead who wants to bring the woman to this realm so that he can live there himself, I think.
I think the transition is also the soldier's grave.
In the end, both soldiers fight each other.
If that speaks to you, I'm grateful for any response.
Our little one has only slept on their back since week 1.
Fast forward: lives still :D
Relax.
Such a child holds much more than one thinks.
Make sure everything is in order, no cuddly toys, go in often and look, but no minute surveillance.
That makes you crazy!
Fresh air in the room.
A good mattress.
No pillows.
Oh, and ours didn't have a sleeping bag, but always a blanket.
Watch your child when they sleep.
Does it turn its head to the side?
Can it stand up from the belly?
Or is it with the face facing down directly on the mattress?
This tells you whether everything is in order.
We've all grown up, and when my husband was born, it was normal to lay the kids on their backs to sleep.
In addition, we are already "regular customers" at your store and have already bought many articles
But why are you only offering me 20EUR?
Hello, I have already written to a colleague of yours yesterday and have not yet received a reply.
It's about my wardrobe, which arrived yesterday (order number #ALPHANUMERIC-ID#).
The right drawer doesn't fit in the cabinet.
I would like to contact you as soon as possible.
The cabinet is currently not in use.
To put it simply.
RBTV has promised a lot.
And yes, I know that not everything can be held.
And I had a lot of fun with RBTV.
But it's just that the politics of this broadcaster are now completely out of control.
Almost every format is sponsored (ok), but then go on a big begging tour.
It was said that one was an "independent" internet broadcaster.
Arno's quote: "One doesn't want to be a running litfass column."
What are we now?
An 0815 advert trying to get its BilloMerch to the elite fan.
And then we have Marah's Do's and Don'ts.
They are natural for everyone, except Simon and Etienne.
They can of course continue to offend people.
A crook who lacks empathy and tries to make ash with the exploded rented rooms at the expense of the action.
How can one find all of this good?
Terrible if you like it, I find it dreadful.
I request a callback as my delivered wooden table is defective.
Corpus break due to damaged delivery of #PRS_ORG#.
Whether as a comforter for stomach aches or simply for cuddling - my little warm friend is versatile and can be used in many ways.
Cherry pit pillows are a traditional home remedy for soothing heat applications, as cherry pits absorb and release heat very well.
The removable inner cushion can be easily warmed up in the microwave or in the oven.
The soft touch makes the application particularly pleasant, so that the little ones feel safe, even if things don't go well for them sometimes.
The cherry-seed pillow with a cover is exclusively suitable for the following applications:
Before warming up the kiss on an unusual smell, check for stock or fire marks and dispose of them immediately if present.
Please remove the inner cushion from the packaging before heating it up!
In the microwave at max. 300 watts for max. 2 minutes (manufacturer's specifications to be observed!)
Immediately after heating, distribute the heat evenly throughout the bed by shaking!
Then the inner cushion is placed back into the cover.
At first warming, there may be a slight formation of moisture on the surface, but this disappears with repeated applications.
Be sure to adhere to the specified heating instructions, as longer periods or higher energy consumption can lead to damage (fire and burn hazard!).
Before heating a kiss in the microwave, check with the manufacturer's instructions to see if corn products can be heated in the microwave.
After the heated inner cushion has been placed back in the cover, please check the temperature of the cushion for babies (max. 43 °C) on your arm!
Do not use the pillow in the event of acute and chronic inflammatory or feverish illnesses, circulatory complaints, fresh hematomas, bleeding and open wounds, and in people with reduced pain sensitivity.
If you have existing skin, heart, vein, diabetes or tumor diseases, or are pregnant, please consult a doctor before use.
If seams have opened and loose kernels are released, dispose of the product and loose kernels immediately and out of reach of children.
If the product is applied to babies under 1 year of age, the temperature of the baby should be regularly monitored during application to avoid overheating!
All serious incidents related to the product should be reported to the manufacturer and the relevant authority in the country where the user is registered.
The connection is removable and washable at 30 °C in the machine.
Please note the care symbols on the product!
Darmstadt after Hinserie second - Pauli wins in Düsseldorf
Darmstadt 98 can dream of returning to the Bundesliga.
Meanwhile, Hannover 96 is working its way out of the relegation zone.
Ingolstadt is also not doing well under the third coach.
Jubilation in Darmstadt after the late victory in the top game, joy in Hannover over interim coach Christoph Dabrowski and frustration in Ingolstadt after the unsuccessful start under new coach Rüdiger Rehm.
Is the battery dead?
Last night my laptop (ThinkPad E480 20KQ and about 3 years old) would no longer charge through my power adapter.
I bought this about 5 months ago, so it should still work.
I thought that a power supply alone would be sufficient for operation.
Error, the battery is empty and the laptop won't start despite the power supply being plugged in.
So I removed the battery, but nothing happens here either.
Maybe you have ideas?
A new battery has been ordered, but why can't I use my laptop in the network?
Is there anything else broken?
Thank you for your help!
I would like to have the delivery of the #PRS_ORG# brought into the room.
How can I book it?
I'm interested in the #PRS_ORG# chair.
But I don't know how high the seat is...
Often on tour and still carrying a lot of equipment?
No problem with the Everyday V2 Backpack from Peak Design.
The 20-litre capacity can also swallow larger photo equipment without any problems, which can be safely stored using the padded FlexFold dividers.
And what you need for everyday objects is well organized and separable from the photo equipment in the individually configurable interior.
With the "update" of the Everyday Line to version 2 (V2), the series is also presented in a new look.
The minimalist design has a bit of a reputation - with the Everyday Backpack series, Peak Design has developed some highly innovative solutions that reliably protect the interior of the backpack while still providing quick access to photo equipment.
It works with two options: one conventional, through the flap that can be closed with the MagLatch locking system, a well-thought-out solution for effective protection that has already proven itself in messenger bags.
There is a metal locking hook on the back of the rucksack with a matching anchor bar on the front of the rucksack.
Unlike most backpacks, Peak Design has considered different "fill levels": there are actually four anchor bars, welded in place, into which the locking hooks can be inserted.
If the rucksack is fully loaded, just take the top bar, if it is rather empty, take the lower one.
The flap and hook are also magnetic.
This way, the rucksack can also be reliably closed without the hook being caught.
The second option fundamentally distinguishes the Everyday Backpack from other camera backpacks: In addition to the flap closure, there is also a zipper opening on both sides of the bag.
This eliminates the biggest disadvantage of conventional backpacks with top access - you no longer have to rummage through the contents!
This clever detail also increases the everyday usability of the rucksack: If you are not only taking your photo equipment, but also everyday objects or travel luggage with you.
In the Everyday Backpack, you can configure the interior space individually (more on this below) and thus store both items separately and independently of each other - and through the two side openings, you can also access them independently.
You can also pull the backpack from the right side towards the body to reach the camera equipment in the right main compartment, while the everyday items stay safely in the left side compartment and don't get in the way.
Comfortable, easily adjustable straps help.
And since the outer shell of the rucksack is also made from 100% recycled, waterproof nylon, the contents will stay dry even if it rains in Scotland in the autumn.
Unfortunately, I waited in vain for the email from their support.
#NAME# sent me an email confirming the assignment
The shipping company has announced that contact has been made to collect the wrongly delivered table.
So far, I have not received any messages.
I request immediate settlement.
I am now writing with the third support employee, none of whom got me any further than the promise that I would receive an email as confirmation.
It is the return of the incorrectly delivered custom #NAME#
When will the wardrobe be delivered again?
Keeping him is not an option for me...
It works.
Many thanks for the help
Wishing you a good evening
Hello, my order number is #NUMBER#. When will the article be delivered?
The order and payment was on 12.1.21.
I was delivered a completely different lamp than I ordered
Please call me
If you extend the voucher to me, then I will immediately place a larger order, but at least I have kept the damaged piece of furniture and not sent it back.
And that the past year went differently than expected I could not have anticipated and could not resolve and clarify in time.
But the damage I as a customer do not accept.
Rotinger brake discs are designed to meet the demands of the dynamic driver, reliability and safety when braking under difficult conditions.
Rotinger brake discs are cast and then mechanically worked (bored and cut).
All painted discs are produced in short series according to individual technical properties, which are specific to certain discs and patterns.
Based on the individual technical drawing, a special production program is created, which is tailored to the balancing of the disc according to the properties of the original mounting.
The discs produced in this way ensure high comfort and braking efficiency.
Additional openings increase the effectiveness of the cooling of the disc, with the cuts improving the cleaning of brake pads and brake discs.
The aesthetic properties of our drilled discs underline the character of each car through an attractive and eye-catching appearance.
Coloma is the city where an unexpected event shaped the history of the West Coast.
In the winter of 1848, a man discovered glowing rocks in the waters of the southern fork of the American River.
Although he tried to keep his discovery secret, the news spread quickly and triggered the so-called "California Gold Rush" of 1849.
Thousands came from near and far and made Coloma one of the fastest-growing and most prosperous cities in the state.
Areas were cordoned off, tents were pitched and saloons and hotels sprang up almost overnight.
Everyone wanted to share in the wealth of the country.
For many it was: "Coloma or Bust" (Coloma or Bankruptcy)!
In this game, you are a pioneer seeking wealth in the West and looking to make a name for yourself.
You will seek gold, recruit workers, gather horses, and build companies.
You will also have the opportunity to explore the surrounding river courses and adjacent areas.
You're not alone - the other pioneers seem to have the same idea!
You have to outdo your pioneer colleagues to avoid going bankrupt with the rest of them.
Coloma is a fast-paced strategy game with many ways to win.
You choose your actions simultaneously, must manage your resources and build a tableau that works more and more for you (so-called "Engine Building").
The buildings on your tableau allow you to become more efficient, gain additional actions, or apply rules to your advantage.
With these buildings and the dynamic bridge plates, you can develop your individual playing style with fine adjustments.
Coloma played over a period of three years from 1848 (the year gold was discovered in Coloma), 1849 (the year of the California Gold Rush), and 1850 (the year California became a state).
A year in Coloma consists of five rounds.
During each round, players secretly and simultaneously choose a location on the board where they can perform actions.
Then their selection is revealed and they place their pioneers in the appropriate locations.
If a location has the most pioneers, it gets a lock!
This deactivates half of the site - reducing the possible actions there.
Then the players take turns performing actions such as gathering resources, moving carts, setting up tents, exploring rivers, building bridges, opening shops, and positioning gunfighters.
When all the actions are completed, the pioneers return.
The auctioneer turns at the start of each round to a new location and changes the available actions.
This goes on until the auctioneer has moved five times, so that each location has been covered once and the year ends.
There is a shootout where the players must defend Coloma from a gang of angry bandits.
If the players have enough revolver men and are numerically superior to the bandits, they will receive rewards.
But if they fail, they receive lower rewards or end up in the cemetery.
The game ends after the third shooting, then the final score is determined.
The player with the most victory points wins!
For free shipping, I accept up to dimensions of 35 x 25 x 4.5 cm. The shipping method is parcel shipping (games folded).
With everything else, usually DPD insured and with tracking (rolled up, wrapped in bubble wrap, and packed in packing paper).
If you are a collector, I can send the card in a cardboard envelope for an additional fee of 2 euros, so that there are no printing marks.
"Why children are not tyrants" documentary, ARD Mediathek
CW psychological abuse, sexual abuse, power abuse
The ARD documentary has appeared in my Twitter timeline today, and I have watched it.
>The children's psychiatrist Michael Winterhoff is a popular guest on talk shows and gives lectures throughout Europe.
With his book "Why Our Children Become Tyrants" (2008), he sparked a heated debate on child-rearing.
Former patients and guardians are now making serious allegations against him.
Please be careful, the film is hard to watch.
And I am very grateful that many people now think and act differently.
Our parents and other responsible adults should never, never, never, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever, ever
Our goal must always be to give the child the freedom to develop and to make the framework for the child as large as possible, given the situation.
Brrr, I'm still shivering.
Holetschek: Countries discuss dropping test requirement for triple-vaccinated
The health ministers of the Länder will decide at their next meeting on a nationwide abolition of the testing requirement for triple-vaccinated people.
"We need clarity quickly as to whether and when the test obligation can be lifted for those who have been vaccinated three times," said Klaus Holetschek (CSU), chairman of the Conference of Health Ministers, to the "Bild am Sonntag".
The removal of 2G plus for triple-vaccinated people is "not only medically justified, but also provides an additional incentive to get vaccinated," said Holetschek.
Federal Health Minister Karl Lauterbach (SPD) has promised to "make a proposal to the Health Ministers' Conference on Tuesday" - AFP
So I want to send the lamp back
How should I go about this?
Hello, I find the #PRS_ORG# chair very nice, but I can't see how high the seat is.
Can you help me further?
I can no longer process any purchases through my #PRS_ORG#.
Ad: Oops, there was an error.
Shopping on the #PRS_ORG# page on the computer.
I have updated my contact details.
What could be the reason for this?
What you describe is referred to as *awareness*, i.e. sensory awareness under full anesthesia.
These occur with a frequency of about 1 in 1000.
Most commonly, it involves hearing sounds/voices, seeing images less often, and rarely feeling pain.
Relevant for this topic: Caesarean sections are operations that are associated with a higher rate of awareness, as one avoids a very deep anesthesia until the baby is born to protect the child.
Previous episodes of awareness should be mentioned during the preoperative discussion.
Certain anesthetic procedures, such as total intravenous anesthesia (TIVA), are associated with a slightly increased risk.
**EDIT: Dear all, this comment of mine describes Awareness correctly, however** u/Nitemarex **had none by definition.
I misread her comment.
However, the chair is defective.
Unfortunately, the 20€ don't help us either.
These are statutory warranty claims.
The absolute minimum would be for them to take back the defective chair.
This is in addition to the legal obligation, which is also a standard in the eCommerce area.
Please check again if they at least take back the defective chair.
We then sell the second chair privately.
We also lose a lot of money.
I have already sent you an email that you have not replied to.
Again, the question.
The order and invoice state that the goods will be delivered to a room of my choice.
The courier is company #NAME#.
I just called there.
They told me they only deliver to the front door - because of #PRS_ORG#.
Is that so?
If yes, I must cancel the order because I do not know anyone who can carry the heavy furniture up to the first floor.
Will I not be called?
I had a question
Theater historian Günther Rühle died at the age of 97
He has made a name for himself as a theatre critic and as an artistic director.
Later, he wrote a monumental theater history.
Günther Rühle died on Friday at the age of 97.
There is still the new book on the table, freshly printed: "An old man gets older."
The shattering diary of a slow farewell to the world, kept by the theater historian and journalist Günther Rühle until April 2021.
And in the middle of reading, the news comes that the author has died.
The last sentence in the book reads: "I testify here already my life's reward."
There are different types of pallets.
One of the most common are European pallets, standardized wooden pallets that are mainly used as load carriers in the European region.
They are certified by the European Pallet Association EPAL
According to data from the Austrian Federal Statistics Office, over ten million pallets were produced in Austria in 2020.
The production value was around 79 million euros.
How many pallets are imported into Austria each year is not recorded
New York wins first MLS championship
New York City FC has won the Major League Soccer title for the first time.
After a 1:1 draw in the regular season against the host Portland Timbers, the Eastern Conference team won the final in the penalty shootout with 4:2.
In the Eastern Conference final, New York defeated Philadelphia Union, the team of German goalkeeper Kai Wagner.
Rouladen tips & tricks
I had many great tips for the perfect goulash a week ago.
That was at Christmas and it was unbelievably delicious and buttery!
So thank you again :)
Now I have come to the taste and I want to cook rouladen for the first time on New Year's Eve.
Tomorrow I will set up a cattle fund.
Do you have any other tips for me?
Note: I don't have an oven, but only a large pot.
What's going on now?
What happened to the books or how do I get them back on my #PRS_ORG#?
My English is not as good as it used to be, but I can manage
It's about a refund of €#NUMBER#.
I was already informed by email on 18.01. that the refund had been made.
But so far, the money has not reached me.
Please check that.
Where there is still Christmas roast in the Lübeck area
For many people, goose or duck are part of Christmas like the Christmas tree and gifts.
Have you not yet bought any poultry?
Now time is running out.
We reveal to you where you can still get a Christmas roast in Lübeck.
The "drive" of a tube output stage contributes significantly to the heat and oil content of a guitar amplifier sound.
These features are perfectly implemented by the Valve Reactor circuit.
With the VOLUME, GAIN and MASTER VOLUME controllers, you can set the desired level and at the same time the distortion of your sounds.
In addition, the VT+ series amplifiers offer a unique POWER LEVEL control that allows you to reduce the volume without changing the "Gain" or distortion.
Above, it was already clear that the POWER LEVEL regulator can even float a performance reserve if it gets too loud.
Thanks to the POWER LEVEL regulators, the full potential of the VT+ series can be used in any situation.
The headphone jack can also be used as a line output.
The signal here is processed with a box simulation, so that you get an "acoustic" sound impression even when using headphones or when recording directly.
An AUX port can be connected to a CD or MP3 player so that you can jam to your favorite songs.
A tuner function is also on board - you don't need a separate tuner.
If you add a VFS5 foot switch, you can also call up the sounds by foot, switch the effect blocks on and off, and tap the tempo of the compatible effects.
For the live operation, this is actually indispensable.
With its new power packages, VOX is taking another step into the future!
But others saw it differently.
Then there is the possibility to send the lamp back?
Because it's too low for a dining table?
So I would like to send them back.
Can you help me further?
And the wardrobe?
Will we get another update on the exact delivery date in the next few weeks?
Hello, have they already sat on the #PRS_ORG# chairs?
If it doesn't work out, I'd be happy with a legacy or gift voucher.
In some cases, I may find a buyer for the furniture.
Only over 1,000 euros worth of goods that I don't need are then a bit much.
I just received my delivery and would like to know if screws were included as part of the delivery.
I would like to mount the #PRS_ORG# Spiegel (mirror) at the designated hinge.
That's not a satisfactory answer and the wait hasn't been worth it
Do you have a premium customer status?
Iran sees progress in nuclear talks
According to Iranian statements, progress is being made in the negotiations on the revival of the international nuclear agreement.
"Both sides are close to reaching an agreement on the issues that should be on the agenda," said Iran's chief negotiator Ali Bagheri to the news agency IRNA on Sunday.
This is a "positive and important development," because at first there was no agreement on the topics to be negotiated.
The agreement is meant to prevent Iran from building nuclear weapons.
On Thursday, Vienna talks to revive the agreement were continued after a one-week break.
Iranian, German, British, Chinese, French and Russian negotiators are taking part in the talks.
A US delegation is also present in Vienna, but only indirectly involved in the negotiations.
Thuringia overtakes Saxony - Free State now a federal state with the highest corona incidence
Thuringia has replaced Saxony and currently has the highest incidence rate in the country.
The value is above the mark of 1000 as the only federal state.
Thuringia was the only federal state on Sunday to exceed the 1,000 mark in the Corona incidence rate.
The Robert Koch Institute reported a seven-day value of 1025 new infections per 100,000 inhabitants.
In Saxony, which has always shown the highest incidence rate nationwide, this value was 990.5 on Sunday.
On Friday and Saturday, the incidence in Thuringia was slightly lower, but was still above the value of 1000.
In Thuringia, 2242 new infections with the Sars-CoV-2 virus and 16 additional deaths were reported within one day.
On Sunday, 200 seriously ill COVID-19 patients were treated in intensive care units in hospitals.
On weekends, there can be delays in reporting.
In addition, the health authorities have been overburdened for weeks and are hardly able to keep up with the registration of new cases.
I understand that.
Since the delivery is not expected until early March, it may be possible by then.
I have to print it out and stick it on the package and give it to the post office, is that it?
Here I don't have to do anything else?
I want to avoid this, so I'm writing to you.
I would like to take responsibility for the return shipping.
8 euro return fee is a cheek in my eyes.
It's time for change
###Welcome to the Bundestag, I am u/StratorDE in the plenary hall in the heart of Europe on a fantastic day!
What is the point of the post here?
If one looks at the activity in the past months of the Bundestag, one can see that it is not existing.
We've come to a winter slump and have extended the summer gap for a few months.
#Where is the problem?
Yes, what was the reason?
To a large extent, this is probably due to dissatisfaction with how things have gone and how we generally present ourselves.
In recent days, it has become increasingly clear that many here are still very much looking forward to the MBundestag.
#What we need to change
At this point, the community around the MBundestag is being asked whether they would like to keep it alive.
The impetus came from u/edizVEVO, who has become aware of this project in recent days and has found, simply put, a pile of rubbish.
After some back-and-forth, several people from the community have expressed interest in rebuilding the project.
However, I would also like to call on everyone to participate, only then can this project also continue to exist in the future.
We have created a discussion platform in the form of a Discord server, where we can exchange ourselves and work on concrete things.
You can join the server through this link.
Goals:
* How should the Bundestag function in the future?
* What existing orders must be changed/amended/removed?
* How should we present ourselves to the outside world in the future?
* How will new members be recruited?
* How do we create a fair election system?
I'm pretty sure I've forgotten something, but that's okay, we have Discord at the end of the day.
If you have the time and the desire, come to the Discord, work with us and let's democratically decide on the future.
I have ordered a lampshade from you that is still to be delivered.
Now I see that the article is too big/clumsy for its purpose and is not suitable for my taste.
For that, I have already ordered a different suspension from you.
I put it together and noticed this when I took the soft foam.
Very sad about that.
I hope it is returned and I get a full refund.
This is also quite sad, as #NAME# is much darker than expected.
I have one more question: the day cover #PRS_ORG# is it also available in oversize, i.e. 240/240 for example?
#PRS_ORG# must guarantee that the faulty cabinet will be collected as soon as possible.
And I ask you to do it now.
I don't have a suitable packaging, I will dismantle the wardrobe as far as possible for collection - they must clarify with #PRS_ORG# how this can be done.
#PRS_ORG# can be reached by phone at any time to arrange a pickup time.
Is there an instruction manual for assembly?
How long would I have had to wait to get this or decide on the return?
How do you answer the question why you are vegan?
Today I had a conversation with a colleague that I like.
She herself has been vegetarian for a while, and currently eats meat only very rarely.
I myself was a vegetarian for some years before.
When asked if I have always wanted to be vegan and vegetarian a planned intermediate step, I answered honestly without much thought.
And that I had long thought that as a vegetarian I would support animal welfare, but eventually reflected and understood that I was ultimately supporting animal cruelty.
That's why I decided to become vegan.
At that moment I had the impression that on their side there was discontent, they then defended vegetarianism and said they knew where their meat came from and as vegetarians they reduced animal suffering.
Now I wonder if my answer to "plump" was too "plump"?
How do they answer the question?
I feel like as a vegan I am quickly put into a corner and conflicts arise without me wanting to.
It greets a harmony-loving vegan (;
It is not an exception under § 312d BGB.
Your #PRS_ORG# does not exempt you from the legal requirements for distance selling.
I am not at the assigned date and time when #PRS_ORG# picks up my return in person.
Since I cannot be present at the funeral, this cannot be changed.
Can I please be given an alternative collection time?
From 01.02.#NUMBER#, I will be available continuously again.
Lahnsteiner fire brigade ready for water rescue: 45,000 euro subsidy from the state
Recently, the Rhineland-Palatinate Interior Minister Roger Lewentz presented a grant decision of 45,000 euros for a new rescue vehicle for the volunteer fire brigade Lahnstein at the town hall in Lahnstein to the Oberbürgermeister Peter Labonte.
The total cost of the vehicle, which has been in use since November 2020, was 135,000 euros.
A good and important investment in security.
I am pleased that the state of Rhineland-Palatinate is supporting us here," says Lahnsteins Oberbürgermeister Peter Labonte.
The equipment van is used by the Lahnstein diving team, one of seven units in Rhineland-Palatinate.
They perform tasks in water and ice rescue and technical assistance.
In Lahnstein, they are permanently counting on increasing deployments: The boom in the hotel shipping on the Rhine and Moselle, as well as the further increasing use of the Lahn as a leisure river, contribute to this.
I bought a book that I could only read 10% of and then the problems started.
I can't open the book.
However, I followed her recommendations and synced, removed and reloaded the app NOTHING has worked.
I am a bit frustrated because the whole thing has already cost me a lot of time and I now hope for help.
Okay, then.
I would like to order 3 articles from the #PRS_ORG# collection for June.
Can I enter a date in the ordering process?
According to the ANSI/PLATO FL1 standard, the previously mentioned values were measured at the Fenix laboratory at 21°C±3°C, 50%-80% relative humidity and with the built-in 275mAh LiPo battery.
The values can vary depending on the type of flashlight used, age, and environment.
*: The burn duration in the Hell stage contains the burn duration with reduced brightness due to the overheating protection.
2) Dealers are responsible for customers.
Customers should contact the retailers or distributors where they purchased Fenix lights for warranty support with the Fenixlight Limited 'Warranty Card' and either a commercial invoice or a receipt.
Fenix will provide our authorized dealers with the technology and parts necessary for the maintenance of our lights.
1) 15-day free replacement: Fenix replaces a new product within 15 days of purchase due to manufacturing defects, if problems occur during normal use.
We will replace it with the same model.
When the model is released, customers receive a product with a similar or improved model.
2) Free repair for 5 years: Fenix offers a free repair for lamps within 5 years from the purchase date if a problem occurs due to normal use.
Different warranty periods for different products:
Except for the products and accessories listed above, other products or free offers from Fenix are not covered by the product guarantee.
3) Limited lifetime warranty: For luminaires that have exceeded the free warranty period for repairs, we offer lifetime repairs, but charge a fee for parts.
The trader shares the cost of the part with the customer before the repair.
4) Guarantee certificate: Customers demand customer service from Fenix dealers or dealers by presenting a completed Fenix guarantee certificate, a purchase receipt or a receipt.
The distributor should offer services to customers and Fenix will support those services.
5) The free warranty does not cover damage or downtime caused by:
Any defects or damages caused by improper use, without being limited to the use that does not comply with the warranty or the instructions in the product specifications.
For example, the product specification describes that the sealed head must not be disassembled, as this can damage the flashlight and make the warranty invalid.
Any defects or damages attributable to other behaviors cannot be adequately controlled by Fenix.
6) To make a claim under the warranty, please contact our warranty department with the following information: Name, type / model of the warranty object, serial number.
Thank you for standing up for this, I have also spent almost a decade in the civil service in a similar role, i.e. we were also weapons carriers in the executive, I will not go into this further!
The question of right and left is always presented very simplistically.
In general, however, one should say that of course the civil servant comes from the liberal to conservative spectrum and not from the revolutionary left, which should be clear to everyone.
It should be clear to everyone that people who are naturally attracted to conservative uniforms and weapon carriers should also be able to handle everyday life, but of course, it is also clear that these people can have a hard time dealing with everyday life, because you have, in addition to the average white person, many Germans with migration backgrounds, women, and also homosexuals (and I mean now not the exaggerated feminine gay stereotype, because these are less common in the executive, but rather normal men and women who you wouldn't notice if they didn't tell you), and on these people, I must rely, because in the end, they may save your life or set this up for you.
But even these fringe groups are also represented, even if it sounds funny at first, according to my experience, a conservative attitude, i.e. they are proud of Germany and feel less taken advantage of by excessive left-wing politics, even though this politics supposedly fights for them or means to do them right, they just want to be treated normally.
Back to the rights, because of course the police and the armed forces are also a cross-section of society, and one will also find extreme right-wing views there, although they are allowed to openly express their opinions or even openly plan state-threatening plans. This is medially exaggerated and annoys me.
Of course, it happens that police officers and soldiers, who were often deployed abroad, start to generalize and say things that are controversial or politically incorrect due to negative experiences.
It also happens that certain right-wing like-minded people meet who engage in a lively exchange of ideas.
Nevertheless, I think this is well fought and also countered with political education and enlightenment!
Germany is so very international and that is also good in my opinion that we cannot afford to have real racists and Nazis in our ranks!
Yes, what I don't understand is that the other basket I also ordered on the German site.
Why should this come from England?
When I ordered, it wasn't sold out.
I already ordered in November.
But it was confirmed to me in your confirmation of the order
It's still about my order, which is no longer available.
I had previously chatted with #NAME#.
Alternatively, one could deliver the other #PRS_ORG# basket for #NUMBER# euros in black to Germany or is this basket available in Germany as well.
I always see you as a partner company.
But there are two deep grooves on the edge of the wooden part that have been filled with something yellow
and on the mirror itself there is a small scratch
Regular through childbirth?
Hello, I have been working on a thing for a long time.
I am very disciplined and organized at work (I am self-employed, have very little free time), but I have been struggling to keep my household clean and tidy for as long as I can remember.
There are always phases where everything is left lying around, and then and now I pack up and clean.
But it's actually never "that someone could just drop by spontaneously."
Unfortunately, my husband is also not better, it bothers me somewhere, but mostly the household just loses against work and laziness.
The kitchen is cleaned regularly because we like to cook.
Now to my question, have you managed to become more orderly with your child?
We haven't got one yet, but we are working on it and this question has been on my mind for a long time.
Because for me, I have no motivation, it doesn't bother me so much as long as no visitors come and there is always fresh clothing and the kitchen is usable.
If you have a child, is it a greater incentive or do you remain slack?
I look forward to hearing from you.
Exclusive, new, and high-quality, anatomically shaped cut, offering maximum comfort, a perfect fit, and allowing almost unrestricted freedom of movement.
Pre-moulding with special, further shaping at the joints for improved mobility (arm and knee bends)
For the Focea Comfort 4, the area covered by the Flex System 2 was more than doubled to further increase comfort.
Seamless stretch panels at the joints reduce friction (shoulder, arm and knee bends)
High-quality pre-forms in the lower back and in the step ensure a snug, perfect fit.
The Elaskin 8.8 Stretch Panel in the lumbar region increases flexibility around the back closure and improves comfort, especially when bending and when mounting and deploying equipment on the surface.
The Free Flex Zone, which is located around the shoulders and back, guarantees increased flexibility in the movements of the arms and back.
Fireskin is a warm, water-repellent material with a special surface structure that offers a high degree of cold protection.
Placed on the chest, it brings warmth to a sensitive area of the body.
Seamless, thin (-2 mm) face seal increases comfort, sealing, and durability (separate helmet)
The collar-mounted zone improves sealing with a fine-adjustable width adjustment by a flexible, gentle adhesive closure that does not adhere to the cover or seams
Double-zippered arm and foot-joint cuffs connect an adjustable inner cuff with a soft, neoprene outer cuff.
45° bend at the end of the inner sleeve for increased elasticity and load-bearing capacity when pulling.
Long zipper at the neck with an elastic reinforcement, for an anatomical cut with increased comfort on the overall without a cap
Langer G-Lock P back zip (overall without hood) with metal slider and integrated water dam system for improved sealing (Beuchat Patent)
Zippers on arms and legs
Neoprene reinforcements at both ends of the zippers to prevent tearing if excessive force is applied.
Neoprene panels bonded together with outer and inner overlap
Edges of the outer straps reinforced for greater load-bearing capacity
Innermanchet edges reinforced for increased flexibility
The original Beuchat system was designed to fix the computer in place, especially at deeper dives (the system is compatible with all common wrist computers)
Career in social work - as someone with a personality disorder?
I have completed an apprenticeship in the field of software development and have been working as a software developer for about a year now.
Unfortunately, I am realizing more and more that this profession is not the right one for me, which is why I have been thinking about starting over and studying social work for a long time.
The problem: I have a self-defeating (or anxiety-avoiding) personality disorder (APS).
This means, in a nutshell, that I have no self-worth and am therefore shy.
I have no problem talking to people on a factual level, but it is very difficult for me to have casual conversations and I have been told many times that I come across as unapproachable (which I believe has improved somewhat).
Can I become a social worker?
I don't want to work as a street worker or in an open youth center, I would rather work in, for example, addiction counseling or family support.
But I don't know if the actual working day is really like I imagine it to be, and it's difficult to find anything on the internet about it.
The ÄVPS is already causing problems for me in my job (for me, emotionally) because it always pulls me down when there's something wrong with my code ("again, just the simplest things are messed up") and it's hard for me to ask more experienced colleagues for help ("I should already know how to do this by now"/"I'm holding him back with my stupid questions"/"he must think I'm underqualified" etc.).
I will probably have problems in every job, but I wanted to mention it at this point.
But have you already returned the sofa?
There was also no confirmation for that.
I'm waiting for a pickup appointment
What do they mean by return please!
If I download a book from the #PRS_ORG#, the message "Your #PRS_ORG# has not authorized this book" does not appear.
Are there problems there?
I was in a chat with #PRS_ORG# who asked if I had received a delivery confirmation for my wardrobe.
The protein (amino acids) taken in with the food is broken down by the bird in its digestive tract into the individual amino acids and used by the bird to build its own body proteins, which it also needs for feather formation.
The feather formation in nestlings and the feather renewal in moulting birds are extremely complex processes and are associated with a particularly high demand on the whole organism of the animal.
Please note that NEKTON-Bio should not be administered during breeding, as it may cause disruptions to the breeding cycle.
After this regular intake of NEKTON-Bio, it should be switched back to daily vitamin intake with NEKTON-S (multivitamin preparation) and NEKTON-MSA (mineral supplement).
The protein (amino acids) taken in with the food is broken down by the bird in its digestive tract into the individual amino acids and from these it builds up its own body proteins, which it also needs for feather formation.
The feather formation in nestlings and the feather renewal in moulting birds are extremely complex processes and are associated with a particularly high demand on the whole organism of the animal.
Please note that NEKTON-Bio should not be administered during breeding, as it may cause disruptions to the breeding cycle.
After this regular intake of NEKTON-Bio, it should be switched back to daily vitamin intake with NEKTON-S (multivitamin preparation) and NEKTON-MSA (mineral supplement).
1 g NEKTON-Bio in 250 ml water or 100 g soft food.
It is only necessary to prepare as much drinking water/soft food as the bird consumes on a daily basis and to change the water/food daily.
A scraped teaspoon (below) equals 1 g of NEKTON Bio.
In severe feather damage, the double or triple dose of NEKTON-Bio can be given at the beginning until the onset of feather regrowth is visible.
After that, the normal dose is administered until the feather regrowth is complete.
Storage: NEKTON-Bio should be stored dry, without sunlight, between 15°C and 25°C.
Please forgive me, but the chair is being sold as an office chair.
How can a desk chair break down after 9 months?
The warranty claims in Germany are 24 months.
That's really bad service.
Hello, I sent an email on Monday to let you know that my order was damaged and pictures were added.
Have you received this email?
A statement by a community worker in opposition to the bylaws
Hello r/LegaladviceGerman,
I have a problem.
A walnut tree is to be felled on our property.
So a petition was filed with the municipality.
An employee writes to me that the felling of fruit trees and thus also the walnut is not part of the statutes.
However, the walnut is explicitly mentioned in the statutes as a protected tree.
Can I now rely on the statement of the employee or not?
On the one hand, I have to rely on an expert opinion.
On the other hand, the statutes are clear.
Thank you for your answers
We understand that.
Then we will use the new packaging for that.
I did not receive any message
Well, then I still have a sofo without use.
Could you offer me a legacy or a gift voucher?
What was more expensive?
Yes, I think so, only the question is whether I can pay in euros and have the roof delivered to Germany
Can you check that?
Urgent report: Serious traffic accident in Selb
Recently, a serious traffic accident occurred on the St 2179 between the exit Selb-Nord and Plößberg.
As the police press alarm currently reports (14:03), a car came onto the wrong side of the road while overtaking.
There are injured people.
Okay, I understand.
Well then, thank you again for making it so easy!
Advice and ideas for further professional life
Merry Christmas to you!
Unfortunately, my Christmas is not very good because my dear head is currently thinking about everything that can be thought about.
Before I go here now ... in short: I need advice and the best from people who somehow know my situation - so from you.
I'm currently doing the refereeing as a newcomer.
Originally I studied something else and worked in that area (to at least remain somewhat anonymous, I won't mention anything more specific here).
But then it was all too boring for me and I looked for alternatives that would be more fun.
At some point I landed in teaching and was sure that was it - even though the conditions are significantly less flexible than in my previous profession, but that didn't matter to me.
I'm now at the third "I Google other job postings" stage.
And it's only been half a year.
When I paint, I always decide to continue and at least finish the ref, after that I can still turn around.
But I am absolutely finished.
I had so little free time last month that I was completely exhausted.
Now it's summer, but there's still a lot of work waiting for me.
Before the ref I always thought I was stress-resistant, but my weekend was also my weekend and my holiday was my holiday.
That was my freedom.
And the stress at work was irrelevant in those moments.
Now, the family celebration is too much stress for me.
And then there are these rigid structures that further irritate me.
In general, it's fun and from the outside it looks like it's running well, which is the feedback.
But I'm completely exhausted and wonder how much stress my body can take before it completely shuts down - if it isn't already.
I wonder if I want to have that rest of my working life - especially when I read some of your contributions here - or if I should go back to the old area where I was valued, had free time when I needed it, and found the work somewhat boring but was paid appropriately and worked together as a team rather than as a lone fighter like it is most of the time now.
But then I wonder if I won't be back at the same place next year, feeling the same way I do now.
You can tell it's all a bit confusing, but maybe you, as outsiders, can offer advice or ideas on how I can get out of this situation that I am completely finished with and start crying at the mere thought of it.
I'm not going to make any decisions right now because I'm feeling very emotional, which probably won't lead to anything good.
But maybe your views can help me to see at least a little light at the end of the tunnel - or to enjoy Christmas, which is enough for me for now.
Thanks for reading and sorry for the whiny tone.
I hope my situation is at least a little clearer.
Since its introduction in 2001, the Valvetronix series from VOX has continued to evolve, leading to the combination of advanced modeling technology with the "Valve Reactor" circuit, which perfectly emulates the behavior of a tube amplifier.
With the VT20X/VT40X/VT100X amps, we are presenting a brand new modeling engine that is absolutely state-of-the-art in terms of sound.
Thanks to the VET technology (Virtual Element Technology), which is based on the analysis of the components and circuit boards, the VTX amplifiers wait with an authenticity that is absolutely impressive.
These amps also contain the multi-stage Valvetronix preamplifier.
This is partly based on genuine analog circuitry, because these capture the sound variations and nuances of a tube amplifier better than any simulation.
In addition to this sophisticated circuit, the VTX amplifiers offer a closed housing and a bass reflex system, from which the natural resonances just burst.
With the "Tone Room" software from VOX, you can even correct and bend historical facts on the virtual level, so that the amp and effects sound exactly as you have always imagined.
The perfect combination of tube sound with modeling technology is mainly due to the 2001 introduced VOX Valve Reactor technology.
Of course, it has been further refined since then to meet the new sound requirements, which again led to a performance boost for the VOX Valvetronix series in 2010 - with more dynamics as well as numerous and significantly improved amplifier models.
The new VT+ Valvetronix series, which includes the handy VT20+ to the VT120+ with two speakers, has been designed so that all guitarists looking for maximum sound variety will find what they are looking for here.
All guitarists dream of the pressure and dynamics of a tube amplifier: they expect a fat sound, a nuanced reproduction of playing dynamics and string attack, and a quick response.
During a detailed analysis, the VOX engineers discovered that the final stage determines the tube-like character of a preamplifier and developed the VOX Valve Reactor technology based on this finding.
The Valve Reactor circuit of each VT+ amplifier perfectly emulates the subtle nuances and character of a tube amplifier.
NBA: Despite 20 points from Wagner, Magic lose to Clippers
The Orlando Magic's losing streak in the NBA continues.
The Wagner brothers can shine - but it's not enough to beat the Los Angeles Clippers.
Despite 20 points from Franz Wagner and seven from his older brother Moritz, the Magic lost 104-106 to the Los Angeles Clippers on Saturday.
The main compartment is also adaptable: with three individually adjustable and foldable Velcro closure parts, it adapts to the needs of your photo equipment and is therefore suitable for all types of cameras - from mirrorless systems of all sizes to full-format reflex cameras.
What actually fits in the backpack depends, of course, on the size of the camera and the lenses.
A possible setup would be a DSLR camera with an attached lens, two to three interchangeable lenses, and a remote flash.
Larger DSLM cameras like the various models of the Sony a7 series or a Fuji X-T2 still have room for further lenses.
In addition, you can also store a lot of accessories.
And if you have a small DSLM camera (Olympus MFT cameras, Fujifilm X-A or E-series) you can use the rucksack for your equipment and for non-photographic items.
Drone pilots will also find the Everyday Backpack 20L a great choice, as the backpack offers enough space for a DJI Mavic Pro with remote control and accessories.
Volcanic eruption on La Palma: longest in history
In the three months since the eruption began, the lava flows on the Canary Island have caused major damage.
Is an end in sight?
The eruption on La Palma has been ongoing for 85 days, making it the longest in the known history of the Spanish Canary Island.
Until now, the eruption of the Tehuya volcano in 1585 with 84 days was considered the longest on the Atlantic island off the west coast of Africa.
There are no reliable data on previous outbreaks.
The activity of the unnamed volcano on the Cumbre Vieja has decreased somewhat in recent days, but volcanologists have not dared to make any predictions as to when it might end.
The indicators point to a slowdown.
The best news is that they are stable," said the president of the island council, Mariano Hernández Zapata, to the state TV broadcaster RTVE.
Damage in millions
In the three months since the eruption began, more than 1,000 degree-hot lava has destroyed more than 2,900 homes and other buildings, according to RTVE.
About 1,200 hectares were covered by a meter-thick lava flow.
That's almost 1700 football fields.
More than 7,000 residents had to be evacuated, and the damage is estimated to be more than 900 million euros.
Two new land masses were created off the coast by cooled lava, with a combined area of about 50 hectares.
The banana cultivation on the island, which is extremely important for the island, was particularly affected, as about half of the approximately 85,000 inhabitants directly or indirectly depend on it, and it was already in a crisis before the volcanic eruption.
225 hectares of banana plantations were destroyed, and further areas were severely affected, according to the newspaper "El País".
Christmas and gifts
Christmas is knocking at the door and especially the children will hardly be able to wait for the heavenly festival.
The many colorful gifts under the Christmas tree have a seductive quality, combined with the spiritual atmosphere and the crackling tension.
Christmas is one of the few traditional occasions that still hold our increasingly divided society together.
The more important it is to become aware of the Christmas tradition of giving, so that the act of giving, which according to the French sociologist and ethnologist Marcel Mauss was a "social contract of natural peoples" that would escape the rigid routine and be filled with life in the context of this tradition.
How Saint Nicholas became the Christ Child
Strictly speaking, it was the Protestants who linked Christmas with gift-giving.
Previously, on St. Nicholas Day, gifts were exchanged in one way or another.
The background to this still popular custom is that Saint Nicholas, as bishop of Myra, secretly threw gold into the windows of three women at night to save them from a life of sin.
This unconventional way of giving gifts gave rise to the popular custom in Germany of filling children's boots with gifts.
Protestants objected to this practice because they reject the idea of mediators between God and humans as "holy worship."
For these reasons, they hide from the institution.
Martin Luther made Saint Nicholas into the Christ Child and thus established a new tradition.
The focus of the gift shifted to Christmas Eve.
Since most Protestants no longer see such details so strictly, it only angers the few that the custom of Saint Nicholas, like the Martin's custom with Martin's singing and Martin's procession, is still a firm part of the pre-Christmas season.
Today, you can find everything from socks to coveted luxury watches in front of the door and under the Christmas tree.
Diversity of traditions in Christian countries
Sources indicate a tradition of giving on the day of Saint Nicholas since the 13th century.
With the Reformation, the day of giving moved to Christmas Eve.
However, in all Christian countries, there is a merry-go-round over the question of who will bring the gifts to the children.
In Germany, it depends on the region as to whether the Christ Child appears on Christmas Eve or the Christmas Man, who in principle is a kind of Santa Claus, to whom some characteristics have been assigned over time.
This includes his white beard, which has little in common with the more austere Assyrian beard of the historical figure, his sled pulled by reindeer, and the preference for the chimney to gain access to the houses.
In the Netherlands, Saint Nicholas remains the central figure on Christmas.
In Spain, the Three Kings give gifts, while in Italy, Befana is said to have shown them the way to the baby Jesus.
In Scandinavia, sometimes faeries bring gifts, while in Russia Father Frost brought some renown.
Here, it's not reindeer, but three horses pulling his sleigh.
In the Czech Republic, the birthplace of the Reformation during the Hussite Wars, the Christ Child is responsible for the delivery of gifts.
I have been getting this error message for 3 weeks when trying to download a new book, but my account and contact details are up to date:
Please help me with the error correction, as I
Otherwise, I would buy another e-book #PRS_ORG#.
I have been trying to get a return shipping label for my order #NUMBER# for the past week and this morning.
I was told that I would receive one.
Since I haven't received any (not even in the SPAM folder), I wanted to ask how long this usually takes.
Thank you very much.
Police shoot suspected bank robber near Royal Palace
An armed man was shot dead by police near Kensington Palace in London on Saturday.
Police said callers reported a man with a weapon entering a bank and a bookmaker's business.
The man fled in a vehicle, which was later stopped by police.
Shots were fired and the man was hit.
He was declared dead at the scene.
The police did not assume a terrorist background.
Several embassies are located in the area around Kensington Palace.
The palace is the official London residence of Prince William, his wife Catherine and their three children.
Other members of the royal family also live there.
What are they?
No matter where I click, I will be redirected to your site immediately.
The decorative light fits harmoniously into every bed, garden area or stone garden.
The light is simply placed and can be anchored in the ground with 2 earth spikes.
Integrated and powerful 0.4 Watt solar module for optimal charging of the built-in battery.
Maximum light duration of 10 hours.
- The robust plastic delivery is available all year round in the outdoor area.
In the Hollywood spectacle, it is usually threatening objects from distant galaxies that glow internally in different colours.
Smart Stone, on the other hand, is completely harmless: The sun alone is responsible for the fact that this solar lamp shines fascinatingly - either in white or colored light (in six different color tones).
The angular, amorphous design is deliberately chosen: Like a natural-formed large pebble, this modern light object presents itself during the day.
Its organic curves fit into any natural environment - whether on the edge of a terrace, in the lawn or in the rock garden.
He also makes himself at home in the company of larger pebbles and stones, where he knows how to assert himself thanks to his size.
You can save a lot of work: "Smart Stone" does not require any wiring or batteries as a solar light.
Set the "beacon" at any place that is exposed to the sun during the day.
Two included earth spikes provide a secure hold when needed.
The matt white plastic hull itself is robust and weatherproof.
His solar panel hides "Smart Stone" discreetly inside, together with his battery and two LEDs - one for white, the other for coloured light.
The battery is already charging when sunlight falls on the house.
As the sun sets, "Smart Stone" begins to light up on its own; you choose the color yourself: There are six attractive light colors to choose from, in addition to daylight white.
The shutdown is also automatic, once the battery charge level drops to a predetermined minimum or it becomes bright again.
Once the sun comes out, the charging cycle starts again the next day.
I've done that several times and it doesn't work.
Sorry, I would have liked to order more from you, but if the voucher is not applied, then I will not order out of principle.
If you think otherwise, please let me know.
Otherwise, that was the last contact.
Then please send me the number for the sideboard.
In the lockdown, no garden centre has opened...
The motor control of the LokSound 5 has been improved again.
A variable-frequency PWM (pulse-width modulation) of 10kHz to 50kHz ensures a super-quiet operation - the typical "humming" is a thing of the past.
The load regulation can now also be adjusted to difficult cases up to 10 CVs.
The unique "Autotune" function allows the decoder to be automatically matched to the motor.
The LokSound 5 decoder provides up to 1.5A motor current, enough for older motors.
- Please use the eBay shopping cart so that shipping costs are combined correctly.
- You will receive an email with the tracking number for the shipment.
- They receive an invoice with the applicable VAT from the specialist retailer for every new purchase.
- We usually process your order or request within 24 hours during working days.
Pill problem
Dear beloved people of the world,
I hope I'm doing this right, it's my first post after a year on reddit.
My problem: I started taking the pill again about five years ago, mainly because I had such awful cramps during my period and awful PMS before my period.
Now I would like to stay like this, because I already take too many medications that I cannot choose for myself due to chronic illnesses.
My main problem, surprisingly not the pain, but my skin.
I had a massive breakout at my last approximately two-year break from 0 to 100 and these were everywhere.
As superficial as it may seem, it has really bothered me and I didn't feel well.
In the two years of pause, nothing has really normalized.
Maybe someone has some tips on how to avoid this this time.
My cosmetics are already fragrance-free and without dyes, but maybe someone can recommend something to me.
Unfortunately, the gynaecologist did not take me seriously and the dermatologist's appointment is still to come.
Many thanks to everyone who has read the book!
Yes, the love of the skin is a thing.
Had severe neurodermatitis, then a period of rest, then widespread lichen planus and the acne topic.
I have also tried various diets in the course of my Christian illness, and have remained on a mixed diet of sugar, milk and meat, because nothing else worked properly.
It can also be good that there is a worm hormonally, but if you want to build everywhere like I do, it's better not to look for it anymore, otherwise you'll go looking for something else that's wrong.
I already had everything of her colleague.
I wrote and now I've lost the conversation and I don't know what was answered to my request.
I have to work in between and suddenly everything was gone on the phone...
What is there to check if the money was there, I would have seen it
Please check my bank details, maybe there was something wrong
But there are them in general in large
because it is available in black and large.
The Zappiti 4K HDR Series - The Ultimate Movie Experience!
Zappiti designs and manufactures high-end video management systems, for excellent picture quality, outstanding performance and best user friendliness.
All Zappiti products are designed to give you a comfortable and intuitive way to access your entire film library in stunning 4K High Definition resolution.
The award-winning Zappiti Player is successfully deployed worldwide to enhance the movie experience, both in the home and in commercial environments.
The Zappiti Neo supports most digital audio and video formats, including the latest 4K HDR standards such as Dolby Vision and HDR10+, almost all current video formats, complete BD/UHD menus, HEVC video codec with a billion colors (10-bit color coding), VP-9, 3D video standards with 3D subtitles, high-resolution audio formats such as DSD, FLAC, ALAC and MQA, and a wide, solid housing, two HDMI outputs, 4K 60p, Dolby Atmos and DTS: X for the best home cinema experience.
The combination of Zappiti Magic Pixel V3 and VS10 video processing offers outstanding picture quality - far better than previous generations - with improved dynamic range, more precise color representation, increased contrast, solid de-interlacing and better upscaling (up to 4K resolution).
Even on a Full HD 1080p TV or a front projector, you will be blown away by the image quality of your display!
3D also offers a better depth of field and an impressive, immersive effect.
Some Android apps are not suitable for use with the remote.
In this case, use a connected computer mouse or an AirMouse (not included in the delivery).
Network replay: Special network optimization that ensures better playback performance over the local network, regardless of the type of media, thanks to SMB protocol (including HEVC UHD files) over Gigabit Ethernet or Ethernet 10/100.
Universal RC: Seamless integration in Smart Home installations using pre-built Control4 drivers, RTI drivers, Elan drivers, Crestron IP codes, Savant, ProControl, Logitech, URC, Pronto and general IP codes.
It doesn't help much as I have been waiting for it since September.
Now nothing is working.
My account appears to be locked and the language is English
Compatible with all printers that use the above-mentioned products, according to the manufacturer or user manual.
Over 10 years of experience as a specialist dealer in toner production
All company and brand names, as well as all mentioned type designations, are the property of the respective legitimate manufacturers and rights holders.
Their mention is only for orientation and knowledge of the compatibility of the goods.
They are not original products of the respective printer manufacturers, but compatible goods.
What vouchers?
I didn't get my voucher for the last order!
In the name of the people: lay people pass judgement
They sit in their everyday clothes on the judge's bench in the courtroom.
But their verdict depends a lot on whether they wear robes: judges decide whether and for how long someone goes to jail.
Two of them report to the "Public" about their time at the Bad Kreuznacher Land Court: Sascha Wickert from Boos and Ruth Ertz from Bad Kreuznach are two of the 125 lay judges at the Land Court on the John F. Kennedy Street.
Hello, unfortunately I cannot access the customer account.
Could you please send me the invoice for order #NUMBER# to the email address above again?
Can we dispose of the packaging material?
We don't have the means to store it for so long.
We would use the table as if it were offered to us, as if it were ours.
I had already ordered the same chair in blue in nov. and received it, so I would like to order one in gray now because they are so nice.
Does the shelf need to be completely dismantled for pickup and return?
And when would the pick-up be?
110 kV underground cables will be built in 2022
The approval for the relocation of the new high-voltage cable in Tann is valid.
The government of Lower Bavaria's plan approval decision clears the way for construction to begin in 2022.
The network operator Bayernwerk has now confirmed this.
The approximately seven-kilometre-long underground cable will connect the transformer station Tann in the north of the municipality and the existing 110-kilovolt line between Simbach and Pfarrkirchen.
The cable will be connected to a mast of the overhead line near the village of Edermanning near Reut.
Good morning
My order from 03.01.21 with the order number #NUMBER# has so far only arrived in parts with us.
The blue delivery number #PRS_ORG# with the order number #NUMBER# was returned by #PRS_ORG# with the note "Delivery not possible".
All three packages have arrived, so delivery is definitely possible.
Can you tell me what the next step is?
A great start to the week!
You can forget that, I have already explained this several times yesterday!
It's a glass commode and all the sides are deflated, so there's glass everywhere and the box is broken
The wardrobe is in my apartment and #PRS_ORG# refuses to come into the apartment because of the #PRS_ORG# rules
This means that the wardrobe cannot be taken away because no one is allowed to enter my apartment
Thanks for the message
But why only 20 euros?
The original value of this chair was #NUMBER# EUR
No, it's the case with all books, so yes, the request to #PRS_ORG# as it seems to be a general problem
Ref: Planning lessons (EK)
Hello dear colleagues and colleagues,
I have been in the REF since summer and teaching geography is fun, but I currently have big problems with time-efficiently planning my geography lessons.
Unfortunately, my school is not well equipped technically, so I can only use the blackboard, the school book and an OHP as a medium.
At school, I can only copy s/w for free (which is annoying for geography).
I currently need to plan my hours very long.
For example, we are currently dealing with the topic of geofactors, and at my company, each hour stands for itself.
In principle, the methods are always the same, but on the other hand, I don't want to invest too much time in simple lessons (I also need that time for UBs, etc.).
I usually plan from the learning goal (what do I want to achieve) and then think about how I can build on that (I usually make a worksheet with texts from books that my school doesn't have).
We have the book Terra and with most of the tasks in the book I am rather dissatisfied.
That is why the work sheets.
Maybe a geography teacher can teach me how to work efficiently with the book.
I would really appreciate it.
I would like to return the #PRS_ORG# from order #NUMBER#
I have actually already decided on a new one at #PRS_ORG#, but I would like to process the return as quickly as possible.
The trade is worried about the 2G regulation for Christmas business.
Only those who have been vaccinated or recovered from COVID-19 are allowed into most stores.
The trade considers it unnecessary and complains of falling sales.
He also has a possible solution ready.
The 2G rules are damaging the important Christmas trade for the retail trade, according to the German Retail Association (HDE).
Sales drops at stores selling non-daily necessities are regrettable, said HDE chief executive Stefan Genth.
According to a current survey by the HDE, more than 70 percent of the companies look negatively on the remaining days of the year.
Many had already written off the Christmas business.
"What should have been the high point of the year is now often a hole without bottom," said Genth.
Traders with 2G access restrictions are said to have lost around a third of their pre-crisis sales in the past week.
It's going well only in the food retail trade and online.
The association demanded consequences from the dramatic development.
The shopping with mask, distance and hygiene concept is a safe affair, said the managing director.
"2G shopping does not help us in the fight against the pandemic," he stressed.
The current regulations scared customers away and required high staffing levels.
He demanded that the band rule be approved nationwide.
After that, each customer would only need to be checked once on 2G (vaccinated or recovered) and would have access to all shops with the wristband they received that day.
In retail, as is already the case in public transport with the 3G rule (vaccinated, recovered or tested), spot checks should suffice.
The property developer specialising in shopping centres, Deutsche Euroshop, also spoke of a difficult Christmas business.
The frequencies were last without 2G at around 75 percent of the pre-Corona level, the turnover at around 90 percent.
These figures will now fall in the middle of the important Christmas trade," said CEO Wilhelm Wellner to the "Wirtschaftswoche".
Due to the high personnel and administrative effort, solutions are being sought and approved for the centers.
This includes the so-called bracelet solution, where "visitors, for example, present their 2G proof at a central location in the center and then, equipped with a bracelet similar to that in a club hotel, can enter all shops without restriction." dpa
I recently ordered and received the #PRS_ORG#.
The Spiegel has a scratch and there is also a mistake on the frame, which was attempted to be covered up with a yellow filler.
That looks bad.
I would like to return the mirror and have already packed it back into the package and sealed it.
How should I proceed with the return now?
The lamp is designed for dual-balance, based on new, flat SMD LEDs with high power and high color rendering.
For setting the color temperature and brightness of the lamp, a modern microprocessor with extraordinary capabilities is used.
In addition to adjusting the brightness, there are two standard color temperatures: daylight and artificial light.
It is also possible to manually set and save the color temperature in the range of 3100 - 5650K.
Use the current settings in the flash memory.
A special feature of the controller is that it is simple and intuitive to use.
The light source produces a very high light output with soft, high-quality, flicker-free light.
The 120-degree beam angle, which allows you to illuminate large areas at relatively close distances, is excellent.
By the way, also in reporter situations in small rooms or short distances.
They can practically adjust the brightness without changing the color temperature.
It's a great tool to work on set or in the studio.
The optional DMX512 controller allows remote control of the light in television studios or when the light is mounted in hard-to-reach places.
On the back of the light is the control panel, consisting of buttons and a glowing display.
The display shows the current brightness setting in percent and the current color temperature in Kelvin.
There is also a slot for NP-F batteries (not included in the delivery)
The user storage has up to three panel settings for brightness and color temperature.
To set the individual settings on the storage locations, simply press one of the storage keys longer and it's done.
The storage controller saves the current state of the lamp when it is turned off, so that when it is switched on again the known situation is restored - very useful in the studio when, for example, the camera is set to a particular colour temperature.
Working with batteries is one of the greatest strengths of the DL3120 functionality, as it allows the use of inexpensive NP-F batteries.
These are often already in the possession of photographers and cameramen (and women) - so you can rely on existing equipment.
The DL3120 can also check before setting whether the batteries have enough power - it is a battery tester built in - for each of the two battery compartments a value in the two display indicators (the left battery upper display, the right one on the lower display).
In addition, it is of course possible to continuously supply the headlights with power through the supplied power supply.
The construction of the Scheinwerfer is very simple.
They have a 16mm thread for attachment, so you can directly attach it to your tripod.
The inclination is reliably set by means of a stop on both sides.
It was also made sure that the mechanical components are of the highest quality and are therefore designed for durability and hard use.
In addition, a knee joint is included in the delivery.
It also comes with a bag in the delivery.
This way you can transport or store the lamp with all the accessories you may want to buy without any problems.
Oh, I got it as a gift and it's too small :(
"Party we wanted to throw": Frankfurt celebrates after a torrid comeback against Leverkusen
What a spectacular reaction from Eintracht Frankfurt.
After 22 minutes, the last two defeats in a row of the Hessen seemed to be on their way to the next Bundesliga defeat.
But then the SGE turned around, shot themselves out of the frustration of a bad start to the season within an hour and won with 5:2. "It's crazy what the guys have done today," jubilated coach Oliver Glasner to DAZN and spoke a "general compliment, to everyone who was there," out.
At first, it looked like another disappointment for the now ninth-placed Frankfurter, who are still not meeting expectations.
Patrik Schick had put Leverkusen in the lead with 2:0.
What then happened was also impressive to the SGE trainer.
"As the players then came back and showed a fantastic performance," Glasner continued.
I am absolutely delighted with the performance we have shown and of course with the result.
Also defender Christopher Lenz, who returned to the field for the first time since the fourth game day and overcame his muscle injury, emphasised the morale of his team-mates.
"I think our mentality is incredible," the 27-year-old said and was pleased with the result in particular for the spectators.
That was the party we wanted to throw today.
However, Glasner wants to keep the focus on himself for the upcoming tasks, but he is also well-positioned in terms of personnel.
It is extraordinary that we have all the players fit in December, that all the players are physically in top shape.
It's top-class work in our medical department, but the players are also highly professional.
Now one wants to "move forward step by step and remain modest" and to complete the tasks until the end of the year "at this level".
Next up is a trip to Borussia Mönchengladbach (8:30 p.m., Sky) on Wednesday as part of the English week.
I will get the mail that my package, due to an error on my part, is being returned to you.
I tried to call #PRS_ORG# and get it redirected, no chance.
Can it be sent directly to me again or do I have to wait until the money is returned and the order is cancelled again?
Unfortunately, for me, it would mean that I would not order again because it has already taken a long time.
Have you ever sat on the #PRS_ORG# chairs?
Handball women's deflector before the quarter-final against Spain
Germany's handball women slumped after the humiliation against Denmark with hanging heads and empty eyes from the court.
At the end of the main round of the World Championships, the DHB selection suffered a heavy defeat with 16:32 (8:13) in front of 800 spectators in Granollers and must now run against the host country Spain in the quarter-finals.
"We were too afraid and had too much respect for the opponent," national coach Henk Groener concluded.
We have to play differently against Spain.
After the first defeat in the tournament, Germany finished the main round group III with 8:2 points as the second place behind the Danes (10:0).
It's a shame we couldn't take the flow with us.
That was a bad game we need to get rid of," captain Emily Bölk said.
In the fight to reach the semi-finals, a significant improvement is needed on Tuesday against the 2019 World Cup runner-up to keep the delicate dream of the first medal since 2007 alive.
The best German thrower in the duel with the three-time Olympic champion Denmark was backcourt player Alina Grijseels with six goals.
"We were simply not there - neither in attack, nor in defence," midfield player Xenia Smits admitted and demanded: "We must now look ahead quickly."
Not level from front to back
Unlike in the previous five matches, the German team was not at its best at the start of the game.
Errors and technical errors in attack and gaps in defence were responsible for a quick 0:4 deficit after seven minutes.
Only goalkeeper Dinah Eckerle was immediately at full temperature and prevented with some parades some worse.
The first goal was scored by the DHB team after 9:30 minutes, when Grijseels successfully completed a quick counterattack.
However, the hoped-for ignition was not.
Against the aggressive defense of the Danes, the German women could hardly get into the game - and when they did, they mostly failed against the strong Althea Reinhardt in the goal of the Scandinavian women.
The game was already over at 3:10 after 20 minutes due to an early start, as defender Mia Zschocke saw a hard foul on her opponent and received a yellow card shortly afterwards.
But she can participate again in the quarter-finals.
Only in the final phase of the first half did the DHB selection play a little better and at least reached five goals before the break.
The already faint hope of a comeback after the change was already gone after seven minutes at 9:19.
The Green-Schützlings again sinned in all areas and made it easy for the well-prepared opponent, who is among the medal contenders at the end of the season, to do so.
As a result, the German team could no longer rise to a performance improvement and went as a clear loser from the court.
DACH Advent Calendar Day 6: Family traditions in the Christmas season
As part of the Reddit Advent calendar, we have celebrated St. Nicholas Day and are using it as an opportunity to dedicate ourselves to family traditions during the pre-Christmas season, Advent, St. Nicholas, Christmas Eve, and Christmas Day.
How was it at home back then?
Like your partner?
Do you want to pass on your traditions to your children?
What is best for the children?
The shoe cleaning?
Baking cookies?
Decorating the tree?
Will music be played?
Will Santa Claus, the Christ Child or is the gift from Oma and Opa?
No matter how you do it, everyone gives themselves and around Christmas, they make a lot of effort to have a good time as a family.
Whether it's now fixed traditions, or even something different every year: tell us how it went or is going in your family!
Please send me any transaction number or anything else that might help
Confirmation of payment... etc
I would like to give out a voucher code
as is the case with #PRS_ORG# gift vouchers
Is that the case for them?
The title is there, I am a mobile vaccinator in mobile vaccination teams where (so far) only the BioNTech/Pfizer vaccine has been administered in nursing homes.
Since these are soon to be completed, I will then go to the vaccination centres for me.
I am happy to answer questions without time limits on organizational and human aspects, as well as medical questions, as long as they are not personal (e.g. "I take medication X, does this conflict with the vaccination...").
In my area of responsibility, I am responsible for the vaccination, the indication (the person has a claim to vaccination under the Corona vaccination ordinance and no reasons against it), the medical documentation and, if necessary, the emergency care in case of allergic reactions (which has never happened to me).
The vaccination itself can be delegated to qualified personnel, such as medical assistants.
In vaccination teams, we often don't have them, but "only" (for God's sake, no lack of appreciation!) pharmaceutical technicians for the preparation of vaccines, who cannot perform vaccinations themselves (they can't), so that I also perform most of the vaccinations there.
Heavy "Huidler" question: Amberger knows the solution
What is a "Huidlerer"?
With this dialect word, sent in from Amberg, the BR television show "Wir in Bayern" has caused a lot of heated debate.
But unlike many previous days, the term "Host mi?" remained a mystery to the callers this time.
No, it was not "a person who is nervous."
And no one, "who has to do everything quickly".
That was what the TV presenter said, people said, was completely wrong.
What the man from Amberg told about the solution and probably also caused astonishment among many Upper Palatines.
"The Huidlerer," the audience learned, "is a cloth used to wipe the oven."
Antony Rowley, a dialect researcher from Bayerischer Fernsehen, has been interviewed as an expert for years. He confirmed this.
With the note that this is a typical Upper Palatinate term, derived in some way from the more familiar dialect word "Houdern".
With which a gap in education was closed - perhaps also for many who have already been living in the Amberg area for a long time.
I can't buy any books for the past 2 weeks.
After confirmation, there is always the following error message: oops - something went wrong - try again later.
I have restarted the #PRS_ORG#, connected it to the PC, synchronized and repaired it.
Nothing has helped.
Tire choice for a racing bike - really so safe?
Today, tomorrow I woke up full of motivation because I wanted to train at least a little for my upcoming cycling tour next week.
Said, done and I rode my racing bike, which I bought yesterday on eBay.
The first 40km were also really nice - but then what lurks in every city centre (this time: thank you Krefeld!) happened.
Glass splinters on the track.
Zack, loud hissing and my rear tyre didn't want to take part in the rest of the journey on any account.
Since I didn't have a real option to get a replacement jacket and wetsuit, I had to turn around and take the first train home with half-hearted mood.
It wasn't quite as bad as I thought, maybe it's better if I practice the tire change before the bike tour.
But now I stand before a question and hope that you can help me.
Since I have a relatively long distance to cover over several days, I would very much like to avoid this problem frequently.
It wasn't really bad, because the old tyres from the previous owner (a very nice old man who had ridden 120km on them the day I picked up the bike at 14:12) and he had already described them as suboptimal because he had ridden on them for many years.
But when I think that I still have to change a tyre after 80-90kms, then I'm really not in a good mood :D
Now I've come into conversation with an older man at the platform, who surprised me by asking why I didn't have the Marathon Plus tyres; these are supposed to be unbreakable.
Now it sounds very tempting.
But are they really so indestructible?
I don't want to spend 40€ on a tyre now, only to be disappointed in the end.
I also wonder: I currently have 25x622 on my racing bike.
They do exist (apparently?) at the Marathon Plus tyres, but the majority are already wider.
Is this a problem?
Or would you recommend me to other tyres in general for a racing bike?
The Schwalbe side seems to be my absolute! Would you recommend the Durano DD?
Thank you in advance for the help and best wishes!
Car hits tree: Driver seriously injured
The 53-year-old was driving his car on the B57 between Rheinberg and Xanten for unknown reasons and then drove onto the opposite carriageway, as the police reported.
There was a head-on collision with the vehicle of a 27-year-old.
The 53-year-old's car was then driven into a tree and the man was trapped inside.
The 27-year-old and his 23-year-old co-driver were seriously injured in the accident and taken to nearby hospitals.
Yes, we have deleted all the books, everything has been authorized and new books have been loaded
Environmentally friendly: The products of MOTIP DUPLI are free of health-damaging metals.
The company group is committed to using formulations without regulated or hazardous ingredients without affecting the best possible performance.
The caps and packaging are made from recyclable materials.
Disposal: Please only empty packaging to the recycling.
Bring containers with leftovers to the problem disposal site.
Designation: All products from MOTIP DUPLI comply with the current labelling regulations.
The classification, categorization, and labeling are done according to GHS/CLP 1272/2008/EG in the current form.
The safety data sheets correspond to REACH 1907/2006/EG, Article 31 and Annex II, in the currently valid form.
Many DUPLI-COLOR spray lacquers have spray safety and tamper-proof caps to prevent unauthorized use.
Please note the corresponding notes on the cap or label.
Before use, always carefully read and observe the warning texts!
Will I get a confirmation by email for that?
I have already been told this by your colleagues three times...how reliable is your information?
When will the freight forwarder contact me?
I have already written, have you not received my SMS?
After the publication of our new high-end broadband B 100-6 OHM, it was only a matter of time before our SOLO series also received new offspring.
SOLO 15 is the new Sprössling and is visually reminiscent of the great predecessors with the B 200 - 6 OHM.
However, this design proposal includes a suitable designed foot directly included to raise the speaker to the correct listening position.
This has no effect on acoustics and can therefore be adjusted accordingly to the circumstances at home.
The SOLO 15 is very well suited for people who are not particularly bothered by the maximum volume, but who want to achieve an exceptionally high sound quality.
A 10 cm speaker is simply not capable of producing such a large sound pressure level unfiltered.
However, this does not mean that the SOLO 15 sounds weak.
In contrast, she is impressively mature and for her size extremely impressive and precise.
The SOLO 15 was tuned to a slight sharp note.
This is common practice for wideband systems to optimize the strong increase in bundling at high frequencies.
The SOLO 15 impresses with a very clear and fine sound, which is perfectly aligned to the listening position.
The treble range can be reduced slightly and so the sound image can be made warmer.
Thanks to the point sound source, the positioning of individual components of a music piece is measured accurately and precisely in the optimal stereo triangle.
The reference-suspicious extremely low mechanical losses of the B 100 - 6 OHM cause a dynamic that is similar to its own.
The SOLO 15 complements our SOLO series and expands it in terms of resolution and accuracy.
As with all our construction sets, it is advisable to think about the final appearance of the speaker at the beginning, so that corresponding changes to the construction can be planned.
If you want to veneer the housing, the subwoofer must be adjusted accordingly, as the veneer adds further material.
After all the plates have been cut (e.g. in the hardware store), one should first drill an 8 mm hole in the floor plate at the corresponding location to be able to run the cable there later.
With the help of a router, the speaker opening in the front is now created, so that the B 100 - 6 OHM can be fitted flush later.
The opening on the back should be provided with a 45° chamfer to maximize the opening area of the speaker chassis inside.
The four screw connection points of the B 100 - 6 OHM get a break in the phase, as shown in the "Phase Detail" image.
Then one begins with the actual construction of the box and places one of the two side walls on a flat surface in front of oneself.
Now the back, the lid, the front and the floor are glued together.
The three reinforcements should also be inserted and glued.
The stiffeners themselves can vary in material thickness if, for example, you want to use ready-made strips from the hardware store instead of making them yourself from 16 mm MDF.
In the next step, the second side is attached.
Then follow all the plates of the foot, i.e. the two sides and the front.
With a suitable drill bit or Forstner bit, the installation of the openings of the bass reflex horn, as well as the connection clamp on the back wall, is facilitated.
Afterwards, a round cutter is used to round off all the corners of the actual box.
The top of the footboard can also be rounded off with it.
After that, the foot plate is firmly glued to the foot of the housing and additionally screwed with long wood screws.
Next, the marking and drilling (2.5 mm drill) of the screw holes of the speaker chassis and the connector.
After the housing has been cleaned of wood dust (suction / blowing), one begins laying the cable.
This is easiest to achieve by the 35 mm bass reflex opening in the back wall.
The entire and uncut cable is pushed through the 8 mm hole in the foot until it reaches the terminal opening and is left there about 30 cm long.
In the upper part of the housing, the cable is led to the speaker opening and left hanging loose there as well.
The frequency selector is prepared and used.
The construction plan for the frequency switch, as well as the corresponding connection plan, can be taken from the following document: Assembly instructions for Weiche Solo 15.
If the frequency switch is installed and the connection terminal is tightened, the sealing of the 8 mm cable opening inside the box, which is not yet completely closed, follows.
By using the 35 mm bASSREFLEX opening and a bit of skill, you can pour hot glue into the opening and seal it.
By opening the B 100 - 6 OHM and with a small lamp, you can check the seal accordingly.
Now follows the treatment, according to the description.
Then the B 100 - 6 OHM is connected and screwed in with the corresponding screws.
The polarity plays an important role here, so that the plus lead (marked cable) must be connected to the plus pole of the speaker (larger contact).
In the end, the bass reflex tube is shortened to the specified length of 28 mm (total length of the tube) and inserted.
To combat the noise, a mat of the damping material is cut into two parts and loosely distributed in the housing.
The opening around the bass reflex channel should be kept open.
Can I also cancel my order now and have it delivered only at the beginning of June?
> Hello everyone
> Finally, we can announce that we will also be hosting the OSCAST again this year!
"Unfortunately, we are not able to get more than four people into the studio due to known reasons, which means that it requires more planning and explains the short-term nature of the announcement.
BUT: There will be at least three people per switch, so we'll be streaming the Oscars 2021 with at least 7 beans and hopefully thousands of you!
> We do our best to avoid delays or other problems.
But hey, it's still a pandemic - we'll do everything we can to make the Oscars as entertaining as possible.
It will start around 0:30.
Make yourself some drinks, plan good food and get ready for a long but very interesting night.
